So I spent the winter and spring swimming harder than I have ever swam in my life, literally. Just check behind my ears and you'll see gills. All of which I could not do without my friend Angie, she herself is an inspiring woman and amazing athlete. My plan - to beat this mental game raging in my head.
Strange thing for me is I have to catch a bus to work!!
-Individual decks and their guidebooks
Desire is anti-knowledge and possibly anti-welfare too.
Cook the chopped onion in olive oil until it turns pale gold.
I don’t miss you all the time, because I can see how at times you were naïve, and I can see clear as day the mistakes you made and the things you sacrificed to be that person. And it’s not lost on me all the things I’ve gained because I’ve lost you, so don’t think that I’m completely sad about where I am now. But I miss you because I can’t feel you anymore, and that lack of optimism is incredibly scary. I miss you because I know you existed, yet I don’t know how to find you again. Even worse, I’m scared I don’t want to find you quite enough to look. Because I’m comfortable now. The cynicism and the skepticism and the pessimism … all the isms feel like me now. That woman may be gone forever.
there is a deep stillness
Every playroom deserves a little whimsical lovin'. It says to the cute kids, "Get your creative juices flowing and have some fun!" I do admit, I have some additional plans on adding some more color and art display for my clan, but for now, they have this great quote spread above their toy storage shelves:
May the blessing of peace and the reality of God's loving presence by yours today!
I like lists because they help me feel like I’m in control, always prepared. But lists sometimes give me the false impression that I can control everything, that I can always be prepared. In theory I suppose it makes sense, but my mind seriously doesn’t work like that. In fact, I don’t work like that, because I love making lists but I am usually really bad about using them.
There are several secondary characters who are not fully developed but presented with sufficient quirks and flaws that I want to read more about them in future ‘episodes.’ Although Cade’s love for his wife has a significant part in the story, this story is definitely action and not romance. Mr. Nassise has created an interesting storyline and characters who you root for and mourn.
Loans under the new revolving credit facility will bear an interest rate of LIBOR plus 3 percent per annum. Proceeds will be used to fund the retirement of the ShopNBC’s existing 11 percent per annum, $25 million term loan and the payment of a roughly $12.4 million deferred payment obligation to a distributor during the first quarter this year.
As we’re on my moped we realise we went passed the house and as we tried to turn in the middle of the street…then… SHIT HAPPENED!!!
Benefits from: Farmer fertilising the crops. Corporation tax and the top rate sure to make a bumper Harvest. Taking his Prime Ministerial dividends.
Truth is, I'm at a stage where the next chapter is the point to which I've been building. It's also the one from which the momentum for the second half will begin. It's important I get it right, and you know what, I'm not sure I can.
so we can go on super dates, and spend extra time together.
Although the first jet engined prototype of the Messerschmitt Me-262A flew in 1942, it did not reach operational status until 1944. The introduction of the jet fighter was delayed for a number of reasons, but the main was that Hitler wanted them to carry bombs while the Luftwaffewanted them to be a fighter only to intercept the Allied bombers raining destruction all over the Reich (which was also causing a shortage in parts and fuel and delaying production and deployment even further). In the end there were a number of versions built that made operational service that included the Me-262 A-1 fighter “Schwalbe” (Swallow) , Me-262 A-2 fighter bomber “Sturmvogel” (Stormbird), Me-262 B-1 two seat trainer, Me-262 B-1a/U-1 night fighter and the Me-262 A-4/5 reconnaissance version. They came into service too late and in too few a number to change the course of the war for Germany but did cause an impact as the first operational jet fighter in the world.
I give this 9/10 - the illustrations added to the sense of action throughout the book.
Starting word count: 50, 831
We got on a roller coaster once, at the Ohio State Fair, while this song was playing, full-blast. We screamed and sang along, all at once. One of those wonderful, great moments of childhood... perhaps she thought of it in her last moments, as I surely will.
Even before he ran for president, it would have been entirely possible for Obama to get to where he was without ever having to prove who he was. In the real world where you and I live we need ID, but Obama operated in a rarefied, radical, left wing, anti-racist world where to ask a black person for proof of citizenship would be tantamount to heresy.
Cut cream cheese into 8 pieces and place in medium bowl. In 1-quart heavy pot, melt butter and chocolate over low heat. Stir to combine. Refrigerate 1/2 hour.
I'm so pleased to host amazing editor with Abingdon Press, Ramona Richards. Ramona has been a great supporter of this blog and she is sharing a first hand experience of hypothermia. I believe first hand accounts are invaluable when writing scenes where a character might experience these symptoms.
Nick Clegg said he “flatly” disagreed that AV is favoured by the Lib Dems because they would be the party most likely to benefit from the system. There is never any certainty how people will vote, but academic modelling shows us that AV “always boosts the Liberal Democrats” (PSA). As a party that presents itself as Centre, the Lib Dems are likely to win many second-preference votes under AV. On that basis, the Lib Dems’ share of seats would be boosted, at the expense of the other establishment parties.
Okay... this is the thing... I would rather have a tiny box of Godiva chocolates than a big box of something else.
Joel: What's 'kills' mean?
Because her shuttle had run away, the girl now sat down to sew. She held her needle in her hand and sang:
With all of these potential threats, citizens across the state are taking preparedness seriously. If you go to the CERT website, you’ll see that at the time I wrote this blog, Texas was second only to California as far as the number of established CERT teams in the state. California has 288 and Texas has 103. Heck, my state of Missouri only has 74! What’s up with that? I remember several years ago as we were developing corporate CERT teams at AT&T, Dallas, Texas was one of the first cities to agree to work with us as they were just beginning to roll out their new CERT program. We worked with the Dallas Office of Emergency Management and produced a great CERT class that included members of the community.
"What was going on in there?!" I asked incredibly as he told me this story.
We once again tried for the herd of Buffalo to the North East of Motswari and for the forth time headed straight back to the same area. I thought it best to mention to my guests exactly why we were returning so as they may not think that I had lost the plot completely. As with all our previous trips we had little success in what we went there for but we did find a very chilled Elephant Bull that put on a show for us while he went about trying to get at a particular type of herb. Sitting with him some time we finally decided that we should go as we still wanted to try follow up on Makipi's and his brother around Mbali and this would all so put us in a good position to respond to the Mafikizolo Pride if it was
The next book for the best book club in the U.S.A. (Go DAFFODILS!) is Patti Smith's memoir Just Kids (2010). I'm not the most informed on Patti Smith's musical career, and while I like Horses quite a bit, I find some of her music is a little too poetic and overtly political for my taste. This book, however, hardly gets into Smith's music at all. Instead it is a kind of dual coming of age story of Patti Smith and photographer Robert Mapplethorpe in late-1960s / early-1970s New York City. It's a story of a foundational friendship and young artists finding their voice. But most of all, its a love story.
Let's imagine that social conditions are far better for people of one colour than another. That perhaps one race has access to better schools or that there are areas that the other race is not permitted to go. Maybe there's also financial inequality.
A few years ago TIPM did do a full review of Fast-print.net (owned by PrintonDemand Worldwide)and I later withdrew the review from the magazine for reasons explained here. So it was interesting when I learned a few months ago PrintonDemand would be a primary sponsor of the event. I should add that the PrintonDemand booth was an entirely separate stand in the main hall of Earls Court. Fast-print.net had a very prominent presence in the Author Zone at Earls Court for the three days of LBF 2012 with seminars most mornings and afternoons.
My heart torn apart in bits as it beats faster with every step you take
The thing about tools, you have to use them. My resistance to this process has been successful...I'm hoping that my resistance will become futile. I need to give in to the process and end this battle.
For over 130 years, Samson has been recognized as a worldwide leader in the development and manufacture of high-performance ropes. Among its many innovations, Samson invented the double braid and pioneered the first high modulus polyethylene fiber ropes. Today, Samson engineers continue to pioneer the use of new fiber technology and the development of innovative coatings and constructions to produce ropes with unprecedented performance characteristics. Samson’s research and development team is meeting an ever expanding market need for products with exceptional performance in critical applications. Samson is part of Wind River Holdings™ portfolio of operating companies. For more information about Wind River Holdings™ visit www.windriverholdings.com.
Juxtaposing this to the Nigerian scenario, Nigerian writers and creative artists have to jettison their mystical appendages in contemporary works. This is not an advocacy for rejecting our roots and beliefs. Writers and artistes remind us of our history, portray the challenges of the present, but more importantly create a future for generations yet unborn. Creative writers channel the thought pattern of society. What type of future are we creating? What type of picture are we painting presently? One shrouded in magic, mystical forces and superstitions. Do we choose to remain at the lowest rungs of societal development? The answer lies in the way we use our pens.
"COME ON, COME ON", shouted Moon to the air behind him!
Today's story will be replaced by a lengthy rumination, of the kind that originally won me so many followers. Tune in tomorrow for more drabbley goodness. Or maybe the day after.
Originally formed to bring together people who had been independently keeping records of the comings and goings of birds, the club now has 100 years of these records, including 57 consecutive Christmas Bird Counts. The records reveal changes in both the bird populations and their habitats. Birds which are common today, such as the cardinal, tufted titmouse, Carolina wren, and red-bellied woodpecker were rare visitors in the early twentieth century, while birds that were common then, such as the evening grosbeak and the purple martin are now rare. Good birding places, such as Sixteen Acres in Springfield are now fully developed into housing, but the Quabbin Reservoir has created a huge wildlife sanctuary in the middle of the state.
Sometimes I have to justify art education to people, as a tool for getting into college, or something . . . but really, what's wrong with art, anyway? What if we all drew things and danced and sang? Would that be so bad? And why can't these rigid thinkers see that artists don't see what they do as genres or labels? It's just making stuff, or being who you are, or exploring. I so wish people could see art the way young children see it. It makes me want to think of a new name for this thing we do. Let's call it creative thinking, or fun, or learning, or Fred. That'll fool them!
The European General Court (formerly the Court of First Instance or CFI) today ruled on the "Metal Rappers" case, T-9/07, Grupo Promer Mon Graphic SA v OHIM, PepsiCo Inc., intervening. This concerned RCD 74463-0001 filed by Pepsico, based on a Spanish priority application. Having been revoked at first instance, Pepsico won their appeal at OHIM. However, Grupo Promer Mon Graphic's appeal to the General Court has just been allowed, overturning the Pepsico registration once more. It remains to be seen whether Pepsico will take this to the top with an appeal to the European Court of Justice (ECJ).
You wouldn't believe how many places you've typed your blog name, until you have to change them all that is. So please excuse our construction round these parts as I continue to get everything all swapped around!
We did a bit of shopping between us; I got myself a lamp for £3 and some comfy pumps for £5. Apart from Morrison’s we were feeling really hot as it was a very humid day. Dec and I walked to town and we walked back again! Dec bought some little army men to play with – those you kind of see on toy story, plastic and green – well he was happy and I was happy, success!
For City, I thought Zabaleta and Clichy were superb, and Nasri played really well in midfield, but it was a very tight game all through, thoroughly deserved by City. They have to hold onto it now, and must beat Newcastle.
When I can upload some photos, I'll show you the garden's progress. Our wall is almost finished! It looks splendid.
the foot is one-seventh of the height of a man
The Pilot E-Gel has the best ink color, the best writing performance, and the best erasability, so I guess you could say it won the all-around competition. The eraser is located in the right sopt, unlike the FriXions, which goes a long way in my book. This pen writes the most like a regular pen.
Then I set it aside. I like to leave it resting over night, just to help the stickiness to really set up. Now I have a cool accent for my art journal or gift wrapping that is vintage, beautiful and can be made in any of the 346 colors Copics come in.
I started by making my favorite Ina Garten chocolate cake recipe. Once cooled baked, I broke up the cake and pulsed the pieces through the food processor in batches. Then I made a batch of cream cheese frosting, mixed it into the cake crumbs, and formed the mixture into little balls. I covered them in plastic wrap, and let them chill in the fridge while I went about preparing the melted white chocolate for the coating.
the affectionately called adulthood.
write about the mating habits of tsetse flies if I got to go to Africa to do it!
Please join me in welcoming Cara Haycak to the YA Authors Cafe!
Among my sacred texts are the poems of Khalil Gibran, published in The Prophet in 1923. While these poems have comforted many people since then, Boston has a special claim on Gibran: born in what is now modern-day Lebanon, the poet immigrated to Boston's South End as a child in 1895 and spent many of his formative years here.
the passive-nonchalant approach: “who knows where this is going to go, im doing it for me, read it or not, i don’t care.”
It is such a joy to watch him grow and he adds twinkle and sparkle to our lives!!! Cant wait to see what all he has in store for us!
I cannot go into detail w/you or anyone else, Flo, as to the other background info that I have. ie: info that even if I did not have the DNA testing? I would know w/o a doubt that he is indeed Elvis Presley, in the flesh. Keep in mind; I was never looking for an alive Elvis, not even. I can tell you this since its part of the interview. When I first contacted “Bern” from the book last year, right? The only name that he or Jes had for me was Eliza Presley, not Alice Tiffin. Ie: keep in mind that only the name Alice Tiffin could link me to you or any of your side of the family. I almost fell out of my chair when “Bern” said that Jesse told him to ask me something. He said it was driving Jesse crazy and that he needed to know who Louise was to me? Was she my aunt? Am I the one related to Louise? I had NOT said one single word about Louise to Jes or Bern! I had no reason to. Ie: ONLY Elvis could have known who your sister, Louise was, Flo.
A: As long as the consumer is presented with the information contained within the print version’s caption via some alternative manner (i.e., roll over, pop up, etc.), captions are not necessary to satisfy the digital replica criteria.
It's a pan-national race to the top, with kids being the undeniable winners.
And finally our attempt at a family photo (I was setting it up in this shot) but it was a huge epic FAIL. I sat them in fire ants and well - that was all she wrote. Bah. I just we just have to go back again soon to try again?! ;)
 Of the children born to White women – there will be fewer and fewer blond, blue-eyed babies (forgive me for using the stereotypical example – just as importantly, there will be fewer and fewer of our wondrously “diverse” White babies with a variety of hair and eye colors). And at the same time, as a result of race mixing, our women will give birth to more and more babies that just don’t “look like us” and just “aren’t us” – babies with nappy hair, thick lips, brown skin coloration, potential DNA-related medical problems, and lower IQs.
We have the passion and the drive to make it, but…we could all do with a bit of support.
Hopefully I will soon have enough money again to be able to make more GW purchases, and perhaps I will even have painted more of what I already have!
His fabulous hugs.
A name as sweet as morning dew.
And all I can think is, I'm going home!
This, of course, is necessary as gleaming stainless steel and spotless well drained concrete floors ensure that the beer that comes out at the other end has been kept separate from all of those microbial nasties that would seek to destroy our favourite brews. But you’d be wrong to think that a brewery is just a beer factory.
At street level, though, they were all too much alike. Rissad's path could have led through any of them. Rel found a park that might have been the one he'd Seen Rissad crossing, now scattered bright yellow with the first daffodils of spring, but there was no way to tell which way the other man had gone from there. Resigning himself to a frustrating afternoon trying desperately not to blink against the wind, Rel opened his eyes and let the cold fingers of Clearsight pluck at his eyeballs.
She was so proud of herself, it made me smile. I really am trying my best to set a good, healthy, balanced example for her. Raising little girls these days is tricky with both anorexia and obesity such huge issues within our society.
Take regular breaks from Facebook, blogs, texts, cell phones, and email. (Yes, even this eZine!) Don't include your computer in any of the above activities. And turn off your phone, too! I promise, your computer and phone won't take it personally! (Neither will this e-Zine!)
2) 'No, I don't want to explain why I am NOT going to shave my legs. I simply cannot be Arsed to get the razor out and de-hair such Man-Hair legs when all I want to do is get into bed and Read My Book.' (We all know that Read My Book means, 'Get-your-hands-off-my-breast/buttock/rude bits-I-am-not-in-the-mood.')
Except the wainscoting, kept it white.
This is not God’s first choice for His creation. Romans 2:4 reveals that God’s preference is to show mercy and kindness: “Or do you show contempt for the riches of His kindness, tolerance and patience, not realizing that God’s kindness leads you toward repentance?” The problem is there are few people who respond to the goodness of God. God loves people more than He loves their comfort. He invests a great deal into mankind. He desires relationship with us and will go to great lengths to create such a relationship in order for us to receive the rewards and inheritance He has for us.
Down here on the ground - 6.7M
I have more to say about this book so I’ve decided to write this review in two parts. Check back for Part 2 coming in a few days. To be continued…
We have tons and tons and tons of shoes. And after going through the shoes that were on the floor of the closet, I have come to a conclusion. One, most of them are mine and two, I have no idea where to store them. But we'll get to that yet.
image from nps.gov
Did they consulte the psychiatrists about this? The portenos may become even more confused about who they are.
I hope our wisdom will grow with our power, and teach us, that the less we use our power the greater it will be.
Ron Paul has expressed for decades his belief that we ought to be far more careful about how we run our foreign policy and I think he makes a valid point. Our country is indeed broke, as Paul always reiterates and we seem to think that we do need to be the policeman of the world. Should we step back from this role? Or maybe more appropriately, will this break our back? In conjunction with these questions, maybe we ought to ask whether we have defined our enemy appropriately. Does Iran want to blow up Israel (and by accident the Palestinians) with a nuclear weapon or is Iran only trying to defend itself? And are our freedoms threatened by the jihadis or are they mad at our foreign policy? And should our foreign policy be changed based upon new conclusions? I pose these questions to my fellow conservatives with hope that you will at least give them careful thought.
Before I reveal today's wacky Wednesday pick I must talk about my SXSW warm-up at the Flogging Molly show on Saturday, or as Ms. Knoxious says I should call it "Blogging Molly" (drum roll and a crash please!).
Francis Edward Clark was born on September 12, 1851 in the village of Aylmer, Province of Quebec, or Lower Canada, as it was then called. His ancestors, however, had lived in “the Old Bay State” for two centuries. His ancestral lineage was peopled with deacons and pastors and descendents who were members of the Orthodox Congregational Church. His young parents went to the Canadian frontier on other pursuits, but both died when Francis was quite young. He said, “All of my boyhood was spent in two Puritan families. . . . My mother and brother were members of the Presbyterian church, in which I, too, was dedicated to God’s service.” Very soon after his mother’s death, his uncle, Rev. Edward Warren Clark, of Auburndale, Mass., came to Aylmer and took him to the uncle’s Auburndale home. The uncle was the first pastor of the newly-formed Congregational Church in Auburndale. Because of ill health, his uncle was obliged to give up his pastorate. But he was elected chaplain of the Massachusetts Senate and Overseer of Harvard College, soon becoming chaplain of the Forty-seventh Regiment of Volunteers in the Civil War.
Wow...so I just completed my first week back in Houston...so far...so good!!! My parents came up to Fort Worth last week to help me finish packing and loading up the Van and Uhaul. Friday, my best friend Charles came over to help and we got everything cleared out of the apt and cleaned up. As must as I was ready to move to Houston, it was still kind of sad leaving Fort Worth. I had been up there for 7 years, when I left for college. Basically, all of my adult life. I've had a lot of great memories, from TCU games, going out downtown, and just hanging out with great friends that I met over the years. But now I am back in Houston. Saturday was spent moving into the new place and getting set up somewhat. My parents stayed around till about 6 or so, then I went and had dinner with one of my friends, Vanessa (who i mentioned in an earlier post). After dinner, we met up with some more friends and went out and had some drinks!!! Charles and my other friend Kristin stayed the night instead of driving back to their side of town. Sunday morning, my original plan was to get up go to church, then stop by the rents house, however, when I woke up with a splitting headache, I basically laid around ALL day. It wasn't a hang over or anything since I only had beer, but I think it had to do with moving 2 days in a row in 100 degree heat and probably being a little dehydrated and tired. Oh well...I wasn't starting work till Tuesday, so I was able to go out to the parents house on Monday, eat at one of my favorite Chinese restaurants for lunch and hang out for a bit.
I'm so thankful for everything that we got. We still have quite a few things that we need before he gets here but we should have it all in time.
Cast: Nia Vardalos, Ian Ziering, Cathy Rigby, Kerris Dorsey, Jade Pettyjohn
You lost the love I loved the most
Till our hearts turn,---our head, with pulses burning,
I should mention the oval Labels die shape in the background is a JustRite custom die made by Spellbinders. It is specifically designed to match stamp sets from JustRite. You can see all the custom JR dies here. That's it for today, I am still unpacking and have project assignments to complete by the end of the month! Thanks for stopping by and have a great day.
to take it to the next level.
These are my last set of photo's I took in the UK, and already they are making me a little nostalgic .
i want to document the day for many reasons. i don't want to forget a single moment of adam's first birthday and will always have this to look back on to remember the details that become fuzzy with time. i'd also like adam to have somewhere to look someday (if i ever come out of the blogging closet with mr. wannabe and adam!) if he'd like to read about how he came to be.
So, we’re creating the main characters, working on the story world and going to put together an animation short film or teaser to shoot the festivals next year.
clothes down, and have room for new stuff when you go shopping!
In this simple article, I will show you step-by-step how to create your own e-book.
Here is a list of just a few I was able to find. Check it out and see if any of these may be suitable for you and your project teams:
I'm glad I made the effort to go down to the beach to get these sunset photos. It would've been so easy to have stayed in our warm comfy cosy hotel. It was freezing on the beach ~ I wished I'd bought my gloves!
The only thing is, I’m not quite sure about all the technical photography terms in English. But I’ll try to make sense anyway. And this course (ahum) is not meant for users of the digital point-and-shoot cameras, although they will probably get some useful information and tips out of this too, but for people who have a digital SLR camera.
Here are another three tips for how to pilot your life (personal or business):
“What?” Marley met the goats stare with his head tilted slightly to one side.
Some may be black
The recipe is not that complicated and has relatively few ingredients. It is all technique in rolling, turning and forming these babies! Of course the rising, glazing and baking are crucial as well. There are tons of recipes using various amounts of butter. The one ingredient that I rarely see but have worked with is a croissant dough containing eggs. It is extremely important to not over mix the dough before adding the larger quantity of butter. Since you are rolling and folding the dough four times (the "turns"), you don't want to develop too much gluten at the beginning of the process or in the end your dough will be tough.
"On April 1, 1572 Dutch rebels captured the town of Den Briel from Spanish troops led by Lord Alva. This military success eventually led to the independence of the Netherlands from Spain. A Dutch rhyme goes: "Op 1 april/ Verloor Alva zijn Bril." This translates to: "On April 1st / Alva lost his 'glasses'". "Bril" means glasses in Dutch, but is also a pun on the name of the town, Den Briel. It is claimed that the tradition of pranks on April 1st arose to commemorate the victory in Den Briel and humiliation of the Spanish commander."
Favorite animal: Labradors
Jesse's New Midnight Special
Remember, this was a time at which nobody had ever even said "erectile dysfuntion" out loud on television. Consequently, we did a very modest, demure spot. No creepy, horny old people in bathtubs.
- The Metro system is AMAZING. We rarely took taxi's unless 1) we were very dressed up and freezing, or 2) we were very lost.
It was some bloke asking about a job vacancy I had applied for and eventually could I come in for an interview at 3pm. I mumbled yes and then hung up. My body wanted more sleep but my brain was asking "which of the many jobs that you threw a CV at 11pm last night was that?". Found the details and after first thinking I'd applied for something the other side of London I started worrying and had a look at the company website.
Interesting quotes from the book
Now, moving on. As the Gilberts entered back into their called mission field, things took a turn. We had now, at our almost half way point in El Salvador, shifted from a service of manual labor to becoming more kid focused now. As Jaymi was on her way out and Kayla was put out of commission with a broken foot and soon to be on a flight back to the states also, it left me, Josh, Colin and Dylan. Colin and Dylan ended up becoming teachers aids at Central Church while Josh, Randy and I started serving at San Martin. Josh quickly adapted to becoming a huge asset to the teaching program there and I assisted and taught when I could, but to be honest preferred to be more on the maintenance side of things. I love the kids, and did teach and tutor, but my preference and I believe some of my skill sets are more aligned with handyman work. But, I will say that I spent plenty of time with our boys at Casa Hogar that I quickly became attached to them and spent more and more time with them. And they eventually stole my heart.
Overall, it was a fun experience to see Craig Ferguson doing his thing, although it was a little disappointing because he might have said 5 sentences (at most) to us in the audience, although when he was leaving the stage, he winked at lesbian row. But it also makes sense that he didn’t really want to talk to the audience since at least half of the people were paid to be there. I was also hoping that I’d be picked to be on the intro segment with Craig, but that didn’t work out. It was a good experience to see how these shows are made, but at the same time it ruined the show for me.
This cake was for her son, Ansel, who turned 7 years old a few weeks ago. I also made some red velvet cupcakes with cream cheese frosting, and chocolate cupcakes with Nutella frosting, but didn't get a chance to take any picture.
10. The man who smokes Blend lives next door to the one who keeps cats.
Anything you want in the world
This is where Batman's diet becomes difficult to decipher. Unlike Tony/Iron Man, whose suit provides him with above-normal physical powers, Bruce Wayne/Dark Knight must rely on his own human strength. He's more shredded than cabbage for coleslaw, but it's all self-achieved. Of all the superheroes in the comic book universe, he is perhaps the only one who elevated his natural physical, mental and intellectual gifts to extraordinary levels through constant practice, focused study and strict discipline - all of which are do-able (hypothetically) for us regular folk. For Batman, as it is for us, there is neither radiation exposure nor secret serum nor alien DNA to keep him in tip-top shape. He is what he does and what he eats.
Please though,lets not regress too far into the realms of the raw,whilst a committed omnivore, biting the head life force out of a still moving prawn doesn't really blow my skirt up.Of course it will be the freshest prawn you've ever tasted,of course it will evoke 'essence of the sea',why wouldn't it? its still bloody alive.
We will be presenting certificate of respect to Dr Kavitaram Shrestha
The embossing folder is a fleur de lis and love the pattern. Some stunning metallic block paper was use as the back ground, ribbon and pearls and there I had 2 quick cards made. Mmm see what creative blitz does lol
She turned around to get something and I shifted in. She turned back and was startled by my sudden appearance. But she shrugged, clearly too drunk or drugged up to care about what I just did. She started to undress.
But is she any different to the starlets who unleash impossibly airbrushed images of themselves on the world at every opportunity, a beacon of unachievable so-called beauty designed to make the rest of us feel, at the very least, a bit crap?
Bring a large pot of water to a boil with tomatillos, onions, garlic, and jalapeno. Boil until the tomatillos turn from bright green to a dull army green. Strain and reserve liquid.
Usually, those kind of books are not my cup of tea. However, Weiner’s smartly written book grips you in a blissful ride from the first chapter. Weiner documents his memoir in a humorous laid back style making this book entertaining.
Mamma, don’t fall my paani!
missing Mandy,
I'm also putting more pressure on myself now. I'm dating a doctor, I have to make a good impression on her new doctor friends. I really don't want to be some slacker who somehow managed to mooch off his girlfriend's success. That's just not right.
Sometimes we laughed, sometimes we cried,
Pity was a funny thing: it would be easier to throw out the real Anne Frank than it would be to throw out a Holocaust survivor so fucked up by the Holocaust that she thought she was Anne Frank. Can you imagine the headlines?
We as human beings are actually incapable of seriously understanding anything on that scale. We can quantify it, we can describe it, we can count and manage and organise it, but we cannot comprehend it.
I think about kids a lot because I work at a hospital; a hospital that only treats kids. A place where there are a lot of kids who are really sick. It makes me think about how many kids there are that aren’t battling cancer, that aren’t going through chemotherapy every other day, but are still slowly decreasing their chances at a healthy life because of the world and society around them.
KC Hop Head and OregonAmy were nice enough to let me host July's Brew Day, and despite some ungodly humidity, I think a good time was had by all. I know I learned a lot, just by watching them do their brews. I chickened out, because I still had yet to figure out how to properly carbonate my Questionable Cream Ale in the keg, and am not loving the results I get from extract brewing. KC Hop Head managed to get my beer all set, so it was tested, and deemed drinkable if not delicious. :) The brews brought by Amy and her husband quite awesome, and I am freshly motivated to move on from "kit" beer. It doesn't look quite as scary and difficult, when everyone else can knock it out while hanging out on my back deck. So thanks for the fantastic company and examples to follow. I'm personally interested in the oatmeal raisin stout that was smelling so nice while boiling! Friends showed up all day and evening, and I thank you all.
4. Mia Freedman
But perhaps most alarmingly for Pakistan's western allies – and some Pakistanis – Khan says he would negotiate with instead of fighting the Taliban militants who have been bombing Pakistani cities. "Anyone who thinks this country will be taken over by Taliban are fools. There's no concept of a theocracy anywhere in the Muslim world for the past 1,400 years. If I came to power, I could end this conflict in 90 days – guaranteed."...
and arms wide enough to rest her everlasting cup
Our St. Nicolas magazine came today.
Jack (singing): "JCPenney's is a gooder place."
David Francis Ferrugio, 46, Middletown, N.J.
Being fashionable and stylish is not difficult. No, in fact it is rather simple when you focus on three parts to your wardrobe.
03 - Let The Good Times Roll 03:36
* This is the 3rd book in the series - there will be some spoilers from the first two books in this review.*
Six months later Brown finds himself in the headlines again. Only this time he is not being applauded but assailed for these same evangelical convictions.
Take my yoke upon you, and learn from me,
Bethany's Sin by Robert McCammon
Well, I am getting tired now, and I want to reserve my energy for the week. I'll have to blog later. But quickly before I go... for recording purposes, I'd like to mention that we worked on geometry this week. Jesse, Travis, Savannah, and I sat around the kitchen table with Jesse's 6th grade textbook, playing with angles and 3D shapes, measuring, drawing, and discussing the angles of rollercoasters and rooflines, and how many faces an object had. Travis drew a triangle, and Jesse a cylinder. They needed no help, they drew them quite naturally. Drawing 3D has always been difficult for me... maybe I'll learn now! :)
I'm afraid of something happening that will affect my vocal cords. (I fucking LOVE to talk my head off and laugh loudly and sing at the top of my lungs, and if anything permanently hinders my ability to do that, I seriously don't know what I will do.)
Deuteronomy 1:21 See, the LORD your God has given you the land. Go up and take possession of it as the LORD, the God of your fathers, told you. Do not be afraid; do not be discouraged.”
LA CA 90026
V. Sultanov - drums, percussion
Wow! May has come around quickly. I still have the post-it note on my desk from the end of November – a polite little reminder to self that I should enter The North Face 100.
Having a bottle on the couch. It's made up as a bed because Daddy goes out there to catch some extra Z's after M wakes up crazy early in the morning. She usually gets back in bed with me - with varying results.
I really wanted to do it today. I wanted to clear his shelves, air the cobwebs, remove the old, and give him a clear, uncluttered space in which to begin his schooling life (on Tuesday). So I put aside the aforementioned train, the fake food and fake picnic set, several books, outgrown clothes, any variation of Wiggles puzzles (or, in fact, anything Wiggles, him being 'too big for them now Mum')... all ready to go to a young friend of ours who will love them too.
So now I am on a quest to counter this annoying fad. I am teaching my beginners to focus on connecting at the chest first without any arms, then let the arms fall wherever they fall. I have no idea if this is a kosher idea, but I know their embrace is very comfortable. I'd rather dance with an absolute novice who doesn't hurt my back and shoulders than a more advanced dancer who does.
5) I would make sure that I spend enough time with him, we talk and talk
but remember there is a price to pay
In the coming months, General Amos said in an interview, the Marine Corps plans to assign about 40 women to 19 battalions of six different types: artillery, tank, assault amphibian, combat engineer, combat assault and low-altitude air defense. Infantry battalions, however, will remain closed to women.
Silence, for a very long period of time.
Breivik is the fool and what misplaced loyalty it would be if he would rather see his mother go to prison for 10 years rather than give up the truth and tell the investigators who his real English ‘mentor’ is.
There is a buzz in the Philippine science circle that Amador Muriel has solved the 3D Navier-Stokes Equation. This equation (or an understanding of this equation) is one of the Millenium Prize Problems of the Clay Mathematics Institute (CMI). These problems collated by CMI are “some of the most difficult problems with which mathematicians were grappling at the turn of the second millennium.”
10. We finally bought a snowblower, just to ensure that it won't snow again for the rest of the winter. So far, so true.
First the story.
That is what matters and why we must defend the gains we have won.
We had the chance to just play this week which is good for our souls. Spring Break is coming to an end and we've painted pottery, played at the park, hit the local theme park not once but twice, spent the night with grandma and grandpa multiple times, had friends over and just played at home. If it sounds busy it was, but much fun!
picking honey suckle
Shay Brandebgerger agrees to stand in as the bride in a re-enactment of Moose Creek’s early history. She doesn’t know elderly Miss Lucy has set up Travis McCoy, (who abandoned Shay at the altar fourteen years earlier), to be the re-enactment’s groom. And supposedly the pastor accidentally sends a real wedding license to be registered for Shay andTroy. Or was Miss Lucy behind that, also?
In the same way, Jesus can give us joy and happiness in our lives even when we feel we are in broken beyond repair. We can find wonderful things out of even the darkest moments of our lives. Our Lord is present with us when it is the very darkness. He has planned that even the darkest of situations that we face will result in redemptive good for us. He surrendered His very own Son to death so that we could have life. He does not abandon us. He does not leave us. He does not forsake us. He is always standing by with love and compassion – to hold us, heal our wounds, and comfort our hearts.
So I was very determined to get more planned stuff in my 2yo workbox this week, so I really started racking my brain (getting back to my preschool teacher years, and reached for that wealth of knowledge that got me my degree). I took a small trip to the local Wal-Mart to pick up a few things, and dug through supplies I have had for years. I looked over a bunch of blogs...and was quite pleased with the stuff I was able to come up with.
Don't be a victim.
Sibley says that we humans are short-changing our experience of life unless we allow ourselves to experience the occasional glimpses of the divine in the ordinary world. We need to be open to being surprised by joy (Lewis again) and to the epiphanies of everyday life.
Now, you see, doing a bootleg CD and selling it is stealing. Ripping a CD and sharing files (and I say “files”, even lossless) for free is a very different thing, it’s promotion, actually.
a) confirmed group (please note inevitably one or two will cancel, even if you notify a month or two ahead because it is the holiday season and well, that just happens anyways)
Most of the independent Irish breweries were represented at the long festival bar, with a mix of regular and seasonal beers. I was along on Thursday, Friday and Sunday with my hit-list, as well as to represent Beoir and talk to punters about Irish brewing history whether they wanted to learn about it or not.
On the IRB forms, I see what you’re saying about the October 7 e-mail, but here’s what you said the next day: “We would also like you to make an appointment to meet with us in late Nov./early Dec. on the IRB submission assignment so we can decide how to process on this research.” The understanding was that we would need to make a decision on what would be appropriate for the IRB submission assignment, not that I would have to turn in a pointless IRB application no matter what. It seemed likely that I would not be doing an IRB application, when I spoke with you and Kathy during the break in my last day in class, and my work since then has confirmed that. (As for the “we” portion of your October 8 statement, at that time I was relying on your assurance that you were not having individual meetings with my classmates. Unfortunately, that has turned out to be untrue.)
His rhetorical flourish is intended as a counterfoil to highlight the impossibility of guaranteeing the whole Bersih wish list.
She’s been making up stories in her head for as long as she can remember but only got serious about it in 2007, after reading Twilight and rediscovering her own dreams to write.
Tuesday: Same deal. Another coat of polyurethane on closet-shelves, back-of-closet, and bookshelf-shelves.
Best Performance in a Supporting Role SHERIDAN SMITH Flare Path Theatre Royal, Haymarket
When Tommy is racing the drug dealer Kayce (Darren Anthony Thomas) for big cash he crashes and you really hope he’s okay, but no the next scene is at a funeral. Not much of a spoiler because we know that already from the story line. Rick is determined to get revenge by beating Kayce in a race and while they prepare for the race they keep getting sidetracked by Kayce, the corrupted cop Officer Flynn (Paul Logan) and the car itself breaking down.
Spellbinders Labels 25
At least the commentators have recognised that her ethnic origin is African, and not insisted in describing her as British because she was born in London.
I understood it would be hard, but it was really the only choice.
If you are using a better meat like beef or pork, what you want to do is brown the meat on all sides and dump it into the main pot as soon as the meat is browned, which will probably be 10 minutes after the beans have reached the 2 hour mark.
PS If you can't see any difference, please leave the blog directly, do not pass Go, and do not collect £200 (as if!).
Have a consultation with the plastic surgeon
Pam Butter spray
Stepping back and photographing my son while he uses a knife requires a fantastic amount of letting go on my part. But I think I do pretty well, and so does Dash. He hasn't mastered the curling in of the fingers but he'll get there.
He told me: “The woman upstairs seen me going in and out of the building with long hair and a bicycle I’d borrowed and a balaclava hat on me head because of the rain and she called the police. They came and talked to me and they went upstairs and they told the woman:
Jackie Leven’s vocals are unique, and will have you on the edge of your seat with the passage of each song, wondering where he will soar to next. I won’t compare him to Roy Orbison, or other celestial-voiced wonders, because, while he has taken on many influences (as Gypsies do), what comes out of his mouth is ALL Leven ALL the time. Jackie’s range is unbelievable, and he has the gift of a classic saloon singer for putting across real depth and emotion.
to humble those who refuse to see
Anyway, as soon as I saw this, it reminded me of my old deep fat fryer. And seeing as it is actually a chemical toilet, my immediate reaction was 'ewww'.
Ethan said, “I don’t trust girls. And especially those girls who have doctor suits on them. She was purposely sent out to grab us and bring us in. We just want the blue print and no help from you ma’am whatever your name is.”
Most importantly, he opened wide the hearts that had been closed in fear, confusion, and ignorance.
I started with this random assortment of glass bottles, that I somehow collected over the years. Chances are, you have a few similar. I wanted them to have a uniform look in the bookcases, and be an accent for the room.
“That was Rohit’s Fault… He took long time to get ready… “
Tempering : Heat oil in a pan ,splutter mustard seeds,add curry leaves and red chilly.Fry for few minutes .Pout this over the chicken .Serve hot.
Will the operational guidelines for the jobseekers allowance be amended to reflect that for some parents the cost of after school care will represent a poverty trap?
But every so often, a cover version will be better than the original — because of a stronger vocal performance like, say, Prince’s version of Joan Osborne’s “One of Us”; or a more soulful performance like Gram Parsons’ cover of Roy Orbison’s “Love Hurts” (and being more soulful than Orbison isn’t easy); or having higher energy, like about half the covers that The Cramps ever recorded. Sometimes a cover will barely resemble the original — good examples being the Elvis songs that The Residents recorded on their 1989 tribute album, The King & Eye.
Eyeshadow in Galaxy(Green), OuterSapce(Purple), Orion(Bronze), and ShootingStar(Pink)
Upon arriving we went back to the same Alaska Backpackers Inn hostel (not only that, they even gave us the same rooms). After many showers we just went downtown for the final dinner. Igor found this Sack’s Cafe place. A bit more than I would normally pay for food. But hopefully the salmon I had was local and wild and not some farm raised in Canada. On the way back from the restaurant we found a strange Russian Pelmeni place in the main downtown Anchorage. That place was owned by some Italian dude who grew up somewhere in South America. Well, I can say authoritatively that his pelmeni still needed improvement.
Recently, it was announced that Bleach was on its last arc in the Bleach manga. However, it was cited that the arc would be longer than the Arrancar arc, which meant a few more years of volume publication and at least a few more years for the anime to follow.
Reduces the bad cholesterol by up to 10 percent.
Trying my hardest
He's coming round to see me today to wish me Happy Birthday, and I feel all guilty because I didn't get to do the same for him so I wondered what the best belated birthday gift I could give him when I have no money.
Peppadews are delicious whole sweet and piquante peppers. This type of piquante pepper was first discovered in early 1993. The name is derived from "Pepper" and "dew". The flavour of the Peppadew fruit is sweet, with mild heat, that is not at all unpleasant. The fruit is processed for removal of the seeds and reduction of the heat, and then pickled and bottled, with a most delicious result. We love them! They are available in the pickle section of most grocery shops.
Greymouth was a ghost town as we drove to the railway station. It was Anzac Day, so everything was closed. Michelle and Jacob booked their tickets and we said our farewells, leaving them with both scooters, on the platform. We jumped into the cockpit and turned The Great White Shark south and off we roared catching the tail of a Southwesterly.
When I saw this recipe I was during a brake at school, and I got hungry imediately! I almost skipped classes to go home and try it :) I didn't but.. when I finally cooked it it waspure and simple delicious!
It’s as simple as that. So mix it up! Keep things fresh and your readers won’t get frustrated… or bored. Now we can move on to topic number two.
Axelrod: Bush lost 6 million jobs and we
When we arrived around 10:30 AM, only a few skiers had "come in" thus the ski "stables" were just about empty.
- however, no problems like that here as I read through it yesterday and really enjoyed it! Good luck in your future publishing career. I have submitted my review to Amazon:
I am entering this into the LOTV's National Craft Month Challenge. This week's theme is "Mum" or "pink" - think I have enough pink on this to qualify (and it is for my niece's birthday!)
I’ll press a top Cuban official to tell us what it would take to let
Here are all of the kids on our side of the family. Notice that Mateo doesnt have on his costume yet. I still wasn't sure he would wear his costume, so I had a Memphis football player as his Plan B costume.
CLICOGATE has yet another twist in the scandal as it appears that $156m of NIB funds was sunk into Clico Investment Bank. Maybe the finance heads can explain to me why National Insurance $$$$$ had to be invested in Clico at a time when it was clear the company was in trouble….was this another form of bailout???????
2- 11: Stephen Hill, WR
- is an adult and able to consent to treatment;
From there it was in to Demo at 9:15 for the Christmas Demonstration. OK it was only December 1st but there would be no more Wednesday Lectures or Demos so now was as good as any time for it. Darina did not practice swordsmanship on any innocent creatures today but took revenge on a Turkey and a Goose by introducing large quantities of stuffing into their recently vacated body cavities.
In that case...could we at least have it run right? As I pointed out in a recent post, the current PLCB administration has presided over an absolute Carnival of FAIL. Can they be held responsible? I think they can. Check the new poll: PJ and Joe Da CEO should resign, or be fired. It's reached that point. As a "shareholder" in this cockamamie "business"...how do you vote?
I was inspired by El Salonsito. They have many gorgeous nail art designs, but the Spray Paint nail art always looks so awesome that I had to try it.
Sentence Begin: 06/21/2006
Which finally brings me to….
...find me a spoon in one
Nita Leger Casey
Let the games begin.
How does it happen?
Black also said “The main focus for Glasgow is to boost its employment status and help improve the city. Large events can bring significant economic benefit to the city in terms of employment and visitor spends. The Glasgow city marketing bureau measures the economic impact of all major events to ensure the city is getting best value from public expenditure on supporting events.”
“The darkest hour is before the dawn”
A family has a tendency so using.
Our living room has a new face!
I am almost at the point where I have concluded that democracy doesn't work, at least not in its present form. Critics of democracy point out that it carries the seeds of its own destruction, and perhaps that is an accurate observation. Democracy is the rule of the mob, and mobs are extremist and psychotic. The French peasants who stormed the Bastille were such a mob. Instead of celebrating July 14th as Bastille Day, it should be a day of national mourning in France. It was a day when madness replaced civilization.
You gotta play.
Some ..we discover with times … that it was worth it to pass it … and others not …
5. Chandelier: Meeting House Chandelier (CH119); Hurley Patentee Lighting
It keeps me baseless in this society that would keep me standing still.
Of course, I had a hard time choosing my 15 blogs. There are so many fine bloggers. I'm sure I will forget some of my favorites, but I'll give it a try.
Then, we placed lots of bloodstained gauze in the wastebasket; I got under the futon, and pretended I had the chills, moaning over and over. I remember the producer came in, saw how ‘sick’ I was, called the studio, and said ‘Wow, Hongo’s really ill,’ and they said they’d wait until I was back on my feet. Then, I realized there was no way out of this, and felt really awful about it. I feel nervous even talking about it now!
You see? This is great stuff, and it’s delivered with that same combination of quick-witted self-deprecation I recognize from those students of mine. And yet: she’s writing her memoir? Also believable, also cringe-making.
Hope all is well with you. Yes, I have been M.I.A. but I have been working on some projects (squeezing some in mommy life and daughter's school time.) I haven't been too lazy on crafting I promise ;)
Paint everything white.
“Pumpkin beers are any beers using pumpkins (Cucurbito pepo) as an adjunct in either mash, kettle, primary or secondary fermentation, providing obvious (ranging from subtle to intense), yet harmonious, qualities. Pumpkin qualities should not be overpowered by hop character. These may or may not be spiced or flavored with other things. A statement by the brewer explaining the nature of the beer is essential for fair assessment in competitions. If this beer is a classic style with pumpkin, the brewer should also specify the classic style.”
cowboy boots scuffing,
To make things easier for him I making this picture my screensaver on the computer so he can see what's on my wish list from Sweet Little Birdy.
His gift is still up in the air - thinking of getting him Yankee's tickets .. since he's a die hard fan! - only problem is that were "use" to 2nd row off the field, right at the 3rd base, at the old stadium - now at the new stadium the tickets are CRAZY $$$ (and we seem to have lost our 'connection' to the seats) .. we both have yet to make a game at the new stadium, not like i'm holding my breathe to go (ummm i hate baseball), but i know he'd enjoy going! ... or thinking maybe Devils vs Rangers tickets for next week's game?? ... or things for his boat??? ... or maybe just stuff for his softballs games??? (new bat, new pants, things like that) ... i'll let him decide
Coloring Medium: Distress Inks- Skin: Tattered Rose, Clothes & Flowers: Broken China,Milled Lavendar,Dusty Concord, Hair & Basket: Antique Linen,Walnut Stain, Leaves & Apples: Bundled Sage
She imagined one man, grey, sitting at his desk, calm despite the panic around him. He was looking at a photograph; his wife, son, daughter, and he was smiling, saying just five words as the floor beneath him crumpled… “you are a lovely lot”.
The discussion papers, due for release on Monday, state that the postal infrastructure and Post Bank are needed by government to deliver services to the people.
PLUSES - The two-toned color scheme is very iconic and symbolic of the "psychedelic" 70's. The team in the block lettering really works for this set. I like the addition of the player's middle name on the back. A simple touch that adds a lot to the set.
I must say, making macarons is quite a process. First, you have to "age" you egg whites at room temperature for 48 hours (although I only aged mine for a few hours). Then, you need almond meal, which I decided to make myself (I know it doesn't need to be this complicated, but I had bought a huge bag of almonds from Costco and needed to use them up!) I blanched the almonds in boiling water for 30 seconds, then rinsed them in cold water so that I could peel/pop them out of their skins.
Raymond Pettibon: Part II: Cutting-Room Floor Show
When we go places I'm the one who has to do everything to get kids ready, deal with kids and keep them from melting down while were out and then deal with calming them down when we get home while he gets to enjoy whatever function we're at and yet he wonders why I don't like going places as a family...I do all the effin work and don't even get to sit for 2mins...how is that supposed to be fun or enjoyable for me?
We planted new stuff this year: green onions, radishes and beets that we never planted before. We also planted leaf and head lettuce, which we haven’t done for a while. I THINK the onions are nearest the gate…only time will tell!
through the traditional democratic land use processes available to the community
Second thing is the consignment ratio payout. The shop gets 60% while the consignor gets 40%. Not the greatest payout, but when I take into consideration the fact that they do all of the work (and their overhead costs and the fact that it gets the stuff out of my house super easily, well, it's worthwhile to me, I think.)
It's a good start: let's hope Cleverly will put aside the politics of confrontation which was the mark of Coleman's tenure at LFEPA, and London will have a fire and emergency authority that is run for the benefit of the city, and not in accordance with a lunatic agenda of obsessive union bashing, and punitive cost cutting, punctuated by the odd luncheon at taxpayers' expense.
I know this is probably something most of you know already how to do, so I feel a little silly putting it up, BUT on the off chance that someone didn’t know and wanted to try it out… here’s how you make roasted garlic paste (btw WAY cheaper to do it yourself than to spend the money on the tubes of paste at the store):
4. We display great endurance, patience and joyful thanksgiving to God
A big thanks to KC9LBO for taking the bull by the horns and providing the instruction and motivation needed to get a bunch of new hams on the air.
And on my students, who are writing what they know: Living in Foxcomm dorm as a line worker. Being the left-behind lonely child of a migrant worker. Seeing your best friend’s dad jailed for corruption. Astonishing. Have a lovely week-end!
invent too many devices for subdividing property, only taking care to let their subdivisions go hand in hand with the natural affections of the human mind. The descent of property of every kind therefore to all the children, or to all the brothers and sisters, or other relations in equal degree, is a politic measure and a practicable one. Another means of silently lessening the inequality of property is to exempt all from taxation below a certain point, and to tax the
Now, as I have mentioned before that I had my name legally changed. I had my name change documents and directions in hand at the DMV on a Monday morning, ready to get my new name on my license. Side note, let me tell you, getting your name changed is no easy task- it almost feels like I’m being punished bc my parents admittedly just gave me the wrong name, they ignored their instincts and gave me a name that didn’t suit me. So as an adult, I’m like pshhh why should I hold onto this old name that no one calls me and just confuses everyone? Oh because it’s really expensive and a ridiculous process to get your name changed. That’s why.
Scandal 3: The Granny Porn Regional Organiser
Anyway, I loaded up all 5 kids, and drove across post to the PXtra, and found the SlipNSlide. It was a Backyardigans one. LOVE that show. GREAT music :) LOL! We drove home, and set it up, and the kids played in it for almost an hour. Funny, that at 7:00 pm, it's still warm enough to play in a SlipNSlide. This Oregon girl was impressed - hehehe. We even had a neighbor kid come and join in the fun.
Each year we begin with the same materials:
Our son and daughter-in-law have been married 6 years. They started out the vision of a young married couple. She finished her college degree while he established himself in his own business. They bought a house, cars, fun toys and vacationed. They gave themselves time to mature while getting to know each other. Then the day came, like most young couples experience, and the decision to have children was made.
What are your priorities? I have a pretty good idea of what mine are. Family is number 1, and anything I need to do for my family comes first. What we NEED to do for our families can be anything. I need to keep the house picked up because it's easier for my daughter to run around pretending she's Tinker Bell if there isn't a bunch of stuff all over the floor. I need to stay on top of laundry because clean T-shirts and towels make Mr Incredible happy. I need to read before bed because it helps me relax and sleep better, and EVERYBODY wins if I'm well-rested.
Living With A Black Dog is not really for me then. I don’t live with any black dogs but my own, and I felt this version isn’t quite as refreshing or fun to read through. It tells someone what to look out for, what not to do, what to do and people you can contact for help. It’s informative sure, but gives off a slightly patronising feeling that the first book did not. There is an agreement at the end you can sign, so before we become friends be sure to go through all my required paper work, okay?
nickname changed from Cinder-slut to Cinderella). Cinderella isn’t quite so perfect in this version; she
The Bikers are a hardy fucking breed, folks.
S xo
I’m not convinced the material makes as much of an impact as the marketing would have you believe, but I can’t bring myself to shell out the cash to find out for real. It’s still painful to pay retail and I miss the days of equipment sponsorships and deep discounts. But, I don’t put in the miles or wear-and-tear that I used to so the Cyfac has lasted a long time.
Not much crafty time again these days but I did manage a new crochet square for the Ravelry crochet along I am taking part in. I don't like it yet. But I feel clever cos it wasn't easy. The star is actuallly a separate piece attached on top. So that was quite clever. That was the easy part though. Following on some of the rest of the Star Overlay rounds was a whole other story. For now I have hidden both squares away so I don't have to look at them till next week & then maybe I will find a bit of love for them again.
It’s nothing but some feelings
I may be letting myself in for some trouble here, but we'll soon find out. One word I cannot stand is Booze. Every connotation that word brings up* is negative to me. Now I expect to see it used in certain places. The Daily Mail, for example, or a certain chain of off-license that advertises 'bargains' to it's customers.
The Asian markets were mostly higher on the week for a net gain of 0.5%. Australia, Indonesia and Singapore are still in uptrends.
When you can find your inner peace
2 – Birthday Parties. I know that birthday parties are supposed to be about the gift of giving presents and celebrating life and another year on this Earth for someone but we all know the true meaning of birthdays… cake and ice cream. Fancy it up all you want that you get to see friends and family, we all know why you’re there – cake and ice cream. Just admit it; it’s okay.
In The Disney Way: Harnessing the Management Secrets of Disney in Your Company, Revised Edition, William Capodagli and Lynn Jackson explain that their book “tells the inside story of just how Disney’s success was achieved — not by epiphanic flashes of creative insight that produced a Pinocchio or a Dumbo, but by the force of a much-considered, carefully wrought process of managing innovation and creativity and by an adherence to a firmly established system of beliefs.” The foundation of that system, the Disney Way, consists of four “pillars”: Dream, Believe, Dare, Do.
The conspiracy against Western Christian / capitalist society began in the 19th Century, if not before. It did not start as a conscious attack on white, Europeans, however, it inevitably became one, initially for no other reason than that Western society was white, European, society.
As night stole the day, their faces were carved with worry. I had a bedroom but today I was sleeping in the basement. It had been like this for about a week now. The only times we were to go out, were at dawn, and an hour before the curfew, because by that time we were sure that the soldiers were patrolling around. Not all of them were helping us. They were actually the ones committing the bad deeds.
Thanks so much for stopping by for a visit. I hope you enjoyed my little card and that Spring is coming to "visit" you too! Thank you, as always, for your sweet comments! Hugs . . . until next time . . . .
We all have good times in life and we all have bad times in life.
43) The French Laundry (Yountville, California)
The moral of this story: No one is perfect. Watch your language. One little word or phrase can change the meaning of everything.
It was about time I revisited the perturbed hilarity of Heathers; a deliciously warped movie that comforts me whenever I'm feeling a tad unbalanced or depleted in the red scrunchy department. You see, I hadn't seen it in at least five years (my overplayed VHS copy just up and died on me). So, as you would expect, the prospect of bathing in its unsavoury light once again had me all aflutter and wistfully woolgathering about blue leggings, shower-nozzle masturbation material, lunchtime polls, cow-tipping, strip croquet ("Sure beats boning on the neighbour's swing"), the perfect hangover cure, and, of course, the breeziness of teen suicide. This film, directed by Michael Lehmann and written by Daniel Waters, is a movie that I used to watch at least once a week back in 1992-93, and it remains to be not only one of the darkest comedies of all-time, but one of the best movies period. Which was a relief, because I was deathly afraid that the film's ability to shock and delight might have softened over the years. But thankfully the film continues to brilliantly skirt that fine line between utter tastelessness and biting satire. Originally, I watched the film because of my healthy obsession with Winona Ryder, but gazing longingly into the diminutive actresses' big brown eyes soon became secondary, as I found myself transfixed by the film's harsh depiction of everyday life at a nondescript high school. The random acts of cruelty and the impenetrable nature of the various social hierarchies all rang true.
Got myntwo feet inside our door
Next - to make some muslin linings so I can use them to store sewing projects.
Griffin Remmington, Lord Reading, is far from perfect - and he likes it that way. How he spends his days is a mystery, but all of London knows he engages in the worst sorts of drunken revelry at night. Hero takes an instant dislike to him, and Griffin thinks that Hero, with her charities and faultless manners, is much too impeccable for society, let alone his brother. Yet their near-constant battle of wits soon sparks desire - desire that causes their carefully constructed worlds to come tumbling down. As Hero's wedding nears, and Griffin's enemies lay plans to end their dreams forever, can two imperfect people find perfect true love?
Our lead trainers for the March training are literacy specialists at Central Washington University in Ellensburg, WA. Ms. Judy Backlund, Dr. Phil Backlund and Dr. Janet Finke provide teacher training through the South Sudan Institute. Simultaneously, 100 Akon students will be participating in a Literacy Enrichment Camp that will also provide an opportunity for teachers to apply their lessons with the support of the trainers.
Walk Out the Front Door, Bonnie Raitt
The relic looks a little dirty too so that's always cool. I'm really hoping Lowrie can stay healthy and hit his stride with the Astros. We all know they could use a good SS during this rebuilding phase.
After considering the draw of physical pilgrimage, inward lettered paths provide the complement. By this I refer to the rewards of reading pursuits. Imagine the roads, air lanes, and waterways finding equivalents among library aisles, pages, and sketched images. Learning is implicit to discovery. Seeking to find is essentially a venturing forth to comprehend. Foraging through written words, books, conversations, even active listening, can mark paths to our own written words. As with geographic travel, voyages through ideas and words must be purposefully sought. In my experience, the lure of promising landscapes is akin to the drive for insight. The latter is a continuing search for practical knowledge and perspective, so that I can take to the trails more skillfully.
Joel concludes on a modestly positive note:
Mark Selby, Vice President Sales & Multimedia, Nokia (UK)
Seeing as it is unlocked Magnus flips the lid open and is blasted backwards (and knocked out) by a powerful warding glyph. Ignoring the smoking warforged his companions examine the contents of the chest. They find not one but two adamantine schema, both identical. It seems that the Whitehearth artificers were thoughtful enough to create a copy. After reviving Magnus with some oil of mending he examines the two tablets and confirms that both are functionally identical, although it's easy to tell that one is also far, far older.
The day was capped off by a special presentation by Dan Grady’s Marvelous Marionette Medley. In his lively interactive presentation Grady explained to the children how the marionettes “work” and encouraged them to have confidence in their artistic abilities.
I love hearing it and singing it. I also think not only about his earthly home (Lord willing with us) but also his heavenly home where God is preparing a place for him and myself, and all of those who accept God's mercy and forgiveness through Christ's death. I love the lines about "Cause the hands that hold the world are holding your heart"..and "Have you heard of the one...who can pull the lame up to their feet." So perfect for Ryan, with his heart condition and his inability to walk. Wow, songs can sure be powerful.
Thus far my new host family has been everything that my old one was not. I have a host mom who is incredibly bizarre in the most charming of ways, a brother who, like most Chilean twenty-year-olds, does little more than study, watch football, or spend time in bars watching football, and a maid/nana who cooks, cleans, and generally makes fun of me for my Gringo habits. The most important thing, however, is that here I feel like a true member of the family, not an awkward and inept guest. We eat once (Chilean tea/dinner) together each night, go out exploring the city, and chat for hours in the kitchen, which is smallest and most cluttered I’ve seen in my life. I’m looking forward to baking my host mom’s favorite – chocolate chip cookies – for her birthday party is this coming Friday.
From June 1 through June 14, you can list your boxes of books then from June 15 through August 1 the book swapping goes live so you can pick as many boxes as you would like. AND to sweeten the deal, Thredup will give you a $5 swapping credit for every box you list that is picked up and reviewed AND a $25 credit towards book rentals at BookSwim.com or 30% off purchased books at Chroniclebooks.com.
The issue of “mean girls” in our culture has been growing and expanding over the past several years. It happens in school, at work, in the movies, on our televisions, through technology and basically everywhere two or more people co-exist.
Epic Eldar
Right now, I’m just someone who’s having a premature quarter life crisis at 22.
I knew he was right. I knew i could let him go now. I felt the love around him and knew that i didnt have to feel sad anymore.
Parish notice first: were you in the audience for a TOTP recording in 1977? A BBC4 team are putting together the launch documentary for next year's rerun fun and want to hear from you if you were, by emailing david.maguire(at)bbc.co.uk
Here is Lady and King checking out the new loot... this baby finally arrived today and I couldn't be more excited!
yes, i'm sure i'm going to get some unpleasant comments on this - but this is my opinion and my blog - a place i can voice my concerns and feelings and to call people out! - and YES i'm calling YOU out for buying a house which use to be home to various wildlife - SHAMEFUL - i hope you don't sleep well at night for what you have done to this enviorment - it's people like you that make this world to deteriorate - we NEED our forests - we need our wildlife - THEY have claim before us!
Rembihnútur (5:05)
I responded by sending him to the Bill Whittle video in this post, and urged him to watch it. After an email exchange, I asked him, "You're a smarter than average guy. You're retired and need to know about this. Have you heard that the CBO says the country will collapse in 15 years?" His answer was no, that he had not. It never broke into the news in any source he follows.
It is an attitude of the mind.
ready for detonation.
I am also stepping out into some new service in my ministries. I continue to learn and develop the truth that to grow in Christ I need to be serving his people. I connect more deeply, love more strongly, and grow deeper the more I strive to have a servant heart.
a severe caffeine addiction (I never
Gaga’s Born This Way is blaring in the background as I model a creepy grin on my face, silently thanking everyone in my life for their influences as I attempt to booty-dance like Beyonce.
Promises
“I can find no justification for something that was not budgeted for and with which aggrieved councillors are now being pacified.”
05-31 New York, NY – Webster Hall
The administrators notified the Florida Department of Education, the Orange County School Board and Columbia College where Jackson-Burch had been a student for three years, that she had cheated, and refused to validate her TABE test score for eight months, causing her to miss out on a pre-planned nursing course, according to the lawsuit.
“I think you will understand a little,” he said. “My teacher of English told me there was a little bombing of London during World War Two. I did not know of that before he told me.”
We also had an orthopedic appointment this month. He told us that he is happy with the progress that she has made by wearing the AFOs. Her feet have stretched out quite a bit. The only thing he was worried about is her tendons. He said that they are still pretty tight. He wanted to give her 6 more months to improve before he made a decision. If at that time the tendons are still tight then he would need to go in and cut them. If they are too tight then she would not be able to stand well enough to walk. Yet another thing to pray for!
10/14 (Fri) 15:00-20:00
The rattle of the bones, and chuckle spread from ear to ear.
About mid-day my seeeeeester Julie shows up with my niece Ellie in tow! We went to a nearby Caribou for a latte and ruckus. After our kids turned the coffee shop gone top business meeting place (who knew?) into a play land that accommodated their large imaginations we began to notice it was time to go. Then a plate hit the floor and shattered into a bazillion pieces with a crash so deafening the entire place went silent and every eye ball knew exactly where to look. Now it was time to go. :)
So basically there’s a big plan to launch an attack and get everybody out of the restricted area and there’s also some groups within the school that intend to betray Shu and Shu’s kinda aware of the fact?
But luckily things have changed over the last 40 years. Not only do we have computers and videos, there are also ready-made molecular models, specially designed for education.
Therefore, there are various indices of the pound’s changing value. They all agree in terms of general trends – wartime spikes in the ‘long’ eighteenth century, nineteenth century a time of low inflation, big spike in the second half of the twentieth century, and so on – but values for given years can be very different. The index I tend to use is the one produced by the House of Commons Library. There’s also an inflation calculator on the Bank of England website, which as far as I know is produced from the same data and should show the same results. According to the latter, the Royal Military Canal cost £14,759,856.35 at 2010 values – which actually looks quite low by the standards of modern capital projects!
because when asked what she wanted painted on her face,
In an attempt to impress Rosie, Peter Dingle actually goes out and gets a job as a soda jerk, but it's not before long that he smashes a banana split in a wisecracking customer's face!
So I’ve got the razor blade
Thanks for calling by today. Please leave me a little hello comment before rushing off to join in the WOYWW fun over at Julia's blog.
First, son Seth and friends started the MLB baseball season touring stadiums "back east." After watching my beloved Tigers at Comerica park in downtown Detroit, he called and asked for my "boyhood address." Soon thereafter, my cell phone vibrated and the following visual message appeared:
Anyway, I’m not gonna bother listing out the syllabus, but hopefully there will be some posts forthcoming under the “Movie Class Film” tab.
Just this October while cleaning out my medicine cabinet I found a two year old bottle of un-opened Effexor and decided I’d take one a day to see what it did to my mind. First time I try psych drugs in over three years but can’t bring myself to share this experiment on my own damn blog because who wants to fight with competitive antipsychiatry ass berets? That’s fucked up . And more fool me, being so wilting lily sensitive but
That girl was Jane, and though she is still sitting in a cubicle during the day, her nights are now spent designing and sewing pillows and other home decor items. The more she sews, the more she wants to share her love of fabric and home decor with others."
Topped half of them with the mushroom mixture
Now on to a little more baseball news. I hear there were a couple little tiffs? I’ll give my take on the two young guys and the two old guys feuding and who is in the wrong.
After I realized that this was going to become a habit, I stuck some felt furniture pads on the bottom so it wouldn't scuff the floor as she was dragging it.
I love the idea of hanging this over a changing table to give baby something colorful and fun to look. Past the nursery stage? How cute would it be to make and hang a few of these for a little girl's spring birthday party?!
Feel, as it drains from you
The doctor notified us that he’s grown five inches since turning 5 and gained three pounds. With the way he’s heating cheese sticks these days I’m betting a few more inches are likely even a few more pounds aren’t. Cleared to return to school, off we went. With a night ballgame, this drive was the time I was going to have with the boy wonder before his birthday.
Nov. 29: Riverside Theater, Milwaukee, WI
I envision myself just driving away and not looking back. Is that normal? There's only so much stress a person can take without a prescription for Xanax.
my craft room would lay on my Martha Stewart score board
Today she offered her advice to a few listeners, including whether a guy should wear skinny jeans! Read all the letters below, and add any advice you may have!
Leo is sick, though. He was sick all weekend, actually, which meant we spent a lot of time watching basketball and football in our cozy basement, so maybe my Monday is all relative at this point. Not sure.
milk 8 cups
This is the view as you walk in the door. This room receives very little natural light (especially with the curtains covering the only window) and it was impossible to get decent pictures. I committed the 'sin' of using flash. Hopefully the 'after' pictures will be better because I intend to leave the window uncovered. Things to note in this picture: Thomas Kinkaid border that I never liked. DARK paint at the top that I never liked. Hideous light with broken shade (from DH swatting a fly on it). Extra kitchen chair for seating.
A sudden chill settled upon her shoulders. Something ominous seemed to hover in the air as the sun was obscured. She looked upward but the sky was filled with black specks, the golden ones gone. The breeze escalated into a strong wind but still the particles started to cover her. They felt evil to her and seemed to chill her to the bone. She started to run but her feet seemed frozen to the ground.
Q: How do you choose your characters’ names?
Yes, and so will you bring down the elementals who await you outside with the sounding of this trumpet. We have shielded you against their assault, but now you must go. The way is clear…the way is clear…
"Well then I'll have to run to the shoppe and get one."
Daddy then proceeded to have the most gentle discussion possible of how important they could be to each other, and reminded them that each of them had been given, by God, exactly one sister on this earth. I teared up when I heard him explain that if they let the petty things fester, they could end up like someone very dear to us and her sister, who haven’t exchanged a civil word in twenty-two years, or spoken at all in the last ten.
-____-
The business currently does very well in selling products in-store, however, although ‘Maynooth Jewellery & Antiques’ has its own website set up (which can be found at http://maynoothjewellers.town.ie/home) and a facebook page (http://www.facebook.com/#!/profile.php?id=100002696756444), they are not maintained to a standard which is required in today’s technology and e-marketing orientated world. Through our recommendations, our team hopes to increase ‘Maynooth Jewellery & Antiques’ sales significantly by improving the shop’s online presence and accessibility to potential customers.
Every Chinese New Year we have this dessert called "nien-gao". It's a chewy sweet dessert that my mom would slice into thin strips, dip in egg and pan fry to get a nice crispy layer on the outside and a gooey warm center. The "cake" is made out of glutinous rice flour, brown sugar, coconut cream and water﻿ and steamed instead of baked. I really wanted to learn how to make it this year since I've really only watched my mom make it before. So I called her up to get the recipe and to my suprise she and my oldest sister came over and helped me make it!
2. All ballots will be in this nation’s language.
The eye contact persists. I persist in breaking it. “It is cold in here, isn’t it?” he asks me from his table. “Yeah … it’s cold, then hot, then cold. I think they’re not using this as much as they should today,” I said, gesturing toward the heater that occupied the space between our tables and the floor-to-ceiling windows. He agreed and we exchanged awkward smiles. I continued working. And did I mention that it was awkward? Every now and then he looked up at me from his books as I thought, “I can feel you looking at me. I know you want to talk to me. Just start talking if you want to talk.” As I pretended to work unaffected, it dawned on me that I wanted him to talk to me, which I knew because the prolonged interruption didn’t annoy me. Fuck it. “What are you studying?” There, I said something. He looked relieved. He was studying for the CFA (7 Points), lives in Astoria (-5 Points), works for Bloomberg (5 Points — I’m sure the position is good), is from El Salvador (5 Points), and was just transferred to New York from Tokyo (500 Points — jetsetting is hot). More than all of that, though, he seemed like a normal, nice, cool guy (countless Points). “Will you watch my stuff for a minute while I …” I pointed toward the restroom and smiled. When I returned, he asked me out for coffee and we exchanged numbers.
I know your each and every weakness.
shall include a minimum fee for each type of service offered by transmitting
I started with a kraft card base. Added a layer of Baja Breeze card stock that I stamped in Baja Breeze for a tone on tone background pattern using images from Surf and Turf. A die cut circle with some fun ocean colors created my base for my focal image.
BG Lauderdale paper collection, sun rays & sun glow.
I placed the kitchen on a small wall right beside our kitchen so the kids could “cook” while I am working in the kitchen. The colors of the kitchen are neutral and go with any decor.
Working from home and changing the way I was photographing for Lune's online shop has simplified and made that a great venue for Lune again. I love the ease of being able to do an update at any moment, night and day, whenever time allows and the mood strikes. My dark backdrop is our living room wall, my dress form is a permanent fixture so it's always ready to go, and the antlers on the wall hang some favorite styling pieces. I have a pretty wardrobe in the sun room which is designated for web shop garments, and camera equipment. I think this basic set-up will serve me well this summer. It feels like things are working out, and I can't tell you how relieved I feel that things are about to get a lot more simple, and a lot more fun around here.
A: It went through so many revisions I lost count. The first draft had Patrick's voice and most of the plot structure. That was it, though. In terms of language or depth, it was execrable. First drafts are often like that for me.
Thank you for believing in the power of love. And for teaching me to believe in it too.
It’s about time we write a post about a model from France in here. Ligeia Wanda is 19 years old and from Rennes in Bretagne. Beautiful Ligeia studies fine art in Rennes, and she is a part time model. She loves to create personal and pleasant photos that reveal her taste, culture, universe or way of thinking. Feminism is important, and she loves to use her body in the art, and play on the relation between eroticism and women – and use of symbols like high heels and corsets.
Freema Agyeman - Martha Jones
The reason white highlights architecture so spectacularly is that it reacts dramatically to light.
A group of 3rd, 4th, and 5th graders, accompanied by two female teachers, went on a field trip to the local racetrack , (Churchill Downs) to learn about thoroughbred horses and the supporting industry (Bourbon), but mostly to see the horses.
A brilliant boogie stomper piece by Boston outfit Duke And The Drivers. "What You Got" is taken from their debut LP, "Cruisin' " released the same year and produced by the legendary Eddie Kramer. UK issue.
An interesting discovery on arriving in Barcelona: the metro's train describer display screen in Catalan reassures you that the next train will be a "PROPER TREN" (but if you should be staying out late, as people in Spain tend to do, you may find yourself relying on a Nitbus).
Frehley's beefs with his former band are succinctly stated, less angry than disappointed and sympathetic (on his part); these brief shots about his former bandmates - mainly Gene Simmons - don't break up the flow of these sometimes hair-raising and often funny stories.
Wow, what a crazy few days it's been. I never dreamed my little infographic would ever get so much attention. Thanks to nerdist.com for originally featuring it over at their blog. Then they told two blogs, and they told two blogs, and so on and so on until tens of thousands of people were looking at it every day. It's my Official Fifteen Minutes Of Internet Fame!
Have a great summer everyone! :)
﻿﻿One thing I forgot to tell you about in yesterday's Buckingham Palace story was the Royal Loos. No good writer or journalist-to-be could ever resist a sneaky peek into the smallest rooms in the palace--I was no exception. They are positively...well...regal, dear readers. Also commodious and throne-like. Quite literally. I have never been seated on so many acres of polished wood to pee, nor been anywhere lavatorial with such grandiose silken wallpaper. The overhead flush, worked by a long chain finished with a crested china pull, sounded just like a roaring Balmoral waterfall. But enough of Royal conveniences. I believe I promised you a Cathedral...
There might not be any new stories under the sun but there are certainly new ways to tell them! Your pitch blurb becomes your tool to show an agent that you have an original new way of telling a romance.
Holy shit. This is honestly a first for me… Oh, hi by the way.
I am excited at the thought of digging into the past this afternoon. If you have any interest in finding out about your family history, the best place to start is by asking older family members questions about your family. Census records and state birth, marriage, and death records are also good starting points. One of the best websites of online collections is familysearch.org and surprisingly, it is free. Ancestry.com is also very good but usually requires a monthly fee. You will be amazed at what you can find…
This is what is meant when we say there is an incremental increase of
Threaded through the story is a secondary plot about Willow's mom and grandma and what it takes to accept your child for who they are. It's equally well done and heart-warming.
CHARITY CAMPAIGN PROVIDES CINEMA FOR RAYLEIGH HOSPICE
My penultimate morning in England was a grey affair. It was a biting cold march day and I was to meet John to say goodbye. When I met him he was in the middle of some weird methadone sell whereby he'd earn £180, and so our last morning together was spent trawling around Shepherds Bush trying to track down a one legged addict called Jack The Peg. When we eventually found Jack – slopping down a free breakfast at The Great Commision Ministry Church – he told us through a mouthful of soupy porridge that he needed to cash his sick benefit before he could buy John's methadone. All together, walking at the pace of a man with one leg and two rusty crutches, we pigeon stepped it (Jack in the singular) down to the Post Office and queued up behind the dead, the pregnant and the insane.
and make the time to really spend the hours and the minutes with each other
Coming from a townhouse with small closets, where I had to be very creative in utilizing every square inch, I knew that when we had the opportunity to build our home that a nice-sized closet with lots of storage space would be a dream come true.
making comfort foods...
He said his new party would be issue-based, practise openness and championed for political transformation in the country.
iii) equally, harmonisation efforts on IPRs must be subservient to the different development needs in Member states; these nations being able to afford the flexibility they need to serve their national ends;
· November 27, 2011 7:00 AM
CONCLUSION: I watched this knowing that it sounded bad, simply as a way to further explore the concept of gargoyles come to life. Even then, this was still a disappointment to both me and Carolyn. It still manages to scrape by with a 5/10 on IMDB because it was still interesting to at least see it. Once. But after that? NEVER AGAIN! This was a necessary hurt for us. And that’s the best comfort I can get out of this.
winner will be anounced asap after the draw
Super Showcase
My cumputer has been threatening to crash and I am also out of space on my harddrive.
I worked at that call center for about three months. It was rather enjoyable in the beginning since I had a real job and started to earn my own money. My teammates were from different backgrounds but we all agreed on having Monster’s Pizza delivered every afternoon (our shift starts at 4pm).
He not only designed the interior and exterior of the hotel, but created a harmonious line of furniture, lighting, carpets and other related furnishings. We take a similar approach in our projects. Typically when we are hired to design a house for a client, we create the landscape and garden plan, the architecture, a fully detailed interior including all the finished and materials, including the fireplaces, banisters, mouldings and other trim appointments, kitchen and other cabinetry. We are also asked to do the interior furnishing and decorating, providing a comprehensive and personalized interior.
Have a wonderful Thanksgiving everyone and may someone like my grand daughter light your life up and show you how to remember how to play and imagine!!
We have more amenities but less time.
sad or happy circumstances always chant and remember that
DJ Sumbody: Yes I still have a show which airs every Tuesdays and Thursdays between 7 – 10 PM called Mashaedi which I do with another local DJ Nangza and my producer Teabag.
Mouth feel: Here is a medium bodied beer that gets a little help in building its body from the mild carbonation.
It's this multidimensional way of journalism that is now standard operating procedure at the Times. Rossi argues that social media has - at least for the short term - saved the paper. The death of several excellent American newspapers is noted in the film and the question of could the New York Times be next is dealt with for much of the second half of this film. One television reporter notes how the paper's trading value is $3 per share, which is less than the cost of the Sunday edition. We also view scenes of a few employees - some of them with decades of experience at the paper, being let go as the managing editor had to make the tough call of which 100 employees would be eliminated in cost-cutting measures. Could the paper go out of business?
“Good morning, Richard,” I say. “I have a particularly aromatic specimen for you. It’s from the land of your birth.”
Delta and the Bannermen is a story about nice people outwitting and defeating a bland, dull and brutal bunch of bad guys, but it is more than this. The pastoral setting is used to create a celebration of love, sex, reproduction and family. It is celebration of life itself. This is brought out through the love story, through the birth of the Chimeron princess and through Goronwy's expositions on the life cycles of insects. It is beautiful.
"Because clinical studies about the safety and efficacy of these products have not been submitted to FDA, consumers currently have no way of knowing
Tomorrow we need to head back to Vancouver so Dave can referee his last varsity football game of this season. After this weekend the teams will have another three weeks of play-offs, then it's on to the state play-offs for the teams that make it that far.
Talking about marketing in internet, Mahir Erkan mentioned that the potential growth success of e-commerce in a country may be measured by 2 indicators, they are: time the users spend in internet and time the users spend on retailing websites. This two indicators show us the volume of potential customers and their rate of increase.
Karla: We can swap book recs, for sure. :) Here’s a question I get a lot… Do you put any of yourself into your characters or storylines, or are your books purely fictional?
Ang - 75
During my artistic life I had several passions, and this hobby turned now into a new one. It´s out of my control, I like to change from now and then and try new forms of art, so for now I embraced Jewelery Design.
I cry Abba Father -
“Investors are exiting euro zone positions because of EU leader’s inability to come up with a coherent approach on Greece that is leading to greater concern about contagion to bigger countries like Italy and Spain.” – Andrew Balls, head of European Portfolio management at PIMCO
SCHRAAG J. Occupational health: a shot in the arm?
Was all that his fault? Of course not. No economy is entirely under the president’s control. He didn’t create the tech bubble or 9/11. His responsibility for the financial crisis is, at best, partial. But Bush’s economic policies — including massive, deficit-financed tax cuts, and his reappointing of Alan Greenspan to lead the Federal Reserve — mattered. And, rightly or wrongly, the American people blame him for the aftermath. He left office one of the most unpopular presidents in U.S. history. And the anger has stuck: A recent YouGov poll found that 56 percent blame Bush “a great deal” or “a lot” for economic problems. Only 41 percent said the same about President Obama.
1/2 teaspoon ginger
Maybe I should.
so, i hope i didn't miss a question. if i did, just let me know and i promise i'll answer asap!
While Jan was walking I went horseriding. After my fall in november last year, I ride Mango again since January. I am still very cautious and do not take much risks.
Happy Sunday! I'm really enjoying the Sparks challenges over on the Paper Smooches challenge blog HERE. This weeks inspiration photo was this sweet Etsy onsie.
Flybe, UK’s largest domestic carrier and short haul European carrier has recently updated its website, brought on a new non-executive director and banished evil debit card charges from its bookings. What with a new ‘Making Flying Better’ slogan, perhaps they mean what they say!
Text & Photo: Eric Danell & Ketsanee Seehamongkol
As for a bad seat, near the band or speakers may not be a desired spot but your friends (and their ears) can handle it. Another spot is near the kitchen, so try and get as much space as possible between the table nearest to it and the kitchen door. Or see if your caterer/location can throw up a standing divider, an attractive one, so your guests don’t feel like they’re in the kitchen.
Sorry I have been MIA for a few weeks! It has been a crazy few weeks! We have officially moved out of our old house and into a furnished home, waiting for the new house to be completed. Fingers crossed, we will be in there in the next 6 weeks! The temporary home is close to our new home and we are getting acquainted with our new 'hood. My little one starts her new school today and I am hoping she loves it and we only have a few melt-downs in the car line!
Revised essays on The Catcher in the Rye are due Friday. Here is a copy of the peer editing guide. If you were not in class today, it is your responsibility to have your essay critiqued by Friday.
I'm told his pride, and his joy, rolled off him in waves........
How cute are they! She's posted a great little tutorial and pattern so you can make some of your very own! I've got my pattern downloaded, and bucket loads of scraps and hope to make some up this week!
My project is a 2 page layout. Hope you like it.
His sons who returned with him are:
The women and the girls who wear the veil.
(and here’s a picture of Skip, stressing out, because I cost him $12 on our date at the Cake concert the other night for two frozen lemonades and some chocolate-almond popcorn…)
Beer: Helping ugly people have sex since 3000 B.C.
9. Children s Portrait
PG Writing
Juice. That’s right. What has this got to do with physics? A lot. But this is not about the liquid component of fruit although, I’m sure, there is a lot of physics going on there whether in terms of molecular structure, the viscosity of the liquid, the refractive index of the juice, its heat capacity, its electrical conductivity, its mass, its colour, its acidity, etc. However exciting the physical properties of juice can be, I will not be talking about this right now but, rather, I’ll be talking about the proposed mission to study three of Jupiter’s moons, namely, Ganymede, Callisto and Europa.
In this case, it is important that there is a slightly heavier emphasis on describing new people and places, while going lighter on familiar ones. Indeed, describing the narrator himself/herself/zirself will be ridiculously weird, if not downright egotistical. Instead, first person narratives run by the ‘unreliable narrator’ format, where certain things can be twisted by perception of the reader so that a ‘false’ chain of events are given to the reader. For example, in Anne Rice’s Vampire Chronicles, Lestat and Louis both share a similar storyline, but their retelling of the events differ significantly because of their personal bent and needing to lie by omission, or by deliberate misinformation.
Talk about a paradox — I met with myself who was with the Plejarans from 10,000 years in the future…that is, the body my soul will inhabit in the future. Wrap your brain around that.
Food grown in your own community was probably picked within the past day or two. It's crisp, sweet and loaded with flavor. Produce flown or trucked in from California, Florida, Chile or Holland is, quite understandably, much older. Several studies have shown that the average distance food travels from farm to plate is 1,500 miles. In a week-long (or more) delay from harvest to dinner table, sugars turn to starches, plant cells shrink, and produce loses its vitality.
One thing I absolutely love is knowing how many times one of my books has been borrowed from a library. It’s thrilling to know that a child has made that decision, has chosen my book because they are drawn to my pictures and story.
Speaking of Walmart....
and, man, she was excited.
Until they find her.
to remind us of our shared friendship and special times together.
All that said, I generally just keep shoyu in my kitchen, as I find it the most versatile of all the soy sauces. I also cook Japanese-style cuisine more often than Chinese, and wouldn’t dream of using Chinese soy sauce in a Japanese recipe – or committing the unspeakable: dipping sushi in Chinese soy sauce. Gasp!
The quote I opened this piece with says the job of the black intellectual is to tell the truth and not grovel to authority. The person who wrote it is either naive or a hopeless romantic. If the black intellectual would like to be unemployed and marginalized they might tell the truth, but I am afraid it will be reduced to a voice crying in the wilderness. Most institutions in America have limited interest in the truth shared through the lens of the black intellectual and failure to grovel to authority is lethal.And, we cannot forget, there are far too many people in America today ( for proof check the public and higher education system statistics) who believe the phrase black intellectual is an oxymoron.
L: and with your dismissal of a claim, you’re replacing it with another claim of your own. Trying to prove atheism to be true is as successful as trying to prove God to be true. There is nothing logical that directs to any evidence that God does not exist. You’re not dismissing anything, you’re simply stating that he does not exist because you cannot find evidence for his existence. Its a matter of principle, not reason
If you want to understand
Format: E-Book
By using the Red Bull Carbon fibre gear case, the rear suspension is also largely taken from the Red Bull. Thus it employs pull rod operation for the springs and dampers. However the KERS installation may follow either Red Bulls Pannier style battery installation or the more typical under-fuel-tank installation.
Erik Wenzel: Warm For Your Formalism
“I’d never ever have sex with him, of course,” Edmondson adds soon after.
Restless, I mentally redesign my container gardens and shop for discount pots. I torture myself with virtual planting combinations, frustrated at the prospect of buying plants that might be underwhelming. I want container garden certainty if I can't have snow and have decided I'd like to stage a dress rehersal for summer.
And then there is Dice-K.
Jaipur-Ajmer-Jodhpur to be taken up in 2012-13.
3. Indigo Earth - Wise Man
Terms and Conditions:
Email me at contact@yourdreamproject.com
Please keep in mind, it's going to look different on every screen! Lesson learned!
Thursday Evening
Gone with the Wind by Margaret Mitchell
Unions dislike these laws for the obvious reason: It reduces their membership.
GET IT OVER WITH
This film cost $28 million or so to make, earned just over $14 million, and all but assured that Bakshi would not return to the raging underground hit status he had attained so long ago when all anyone expected from him were horny cats and social commentary. As a matter of fact, the story goes that the film's animators weren't even given as much as a screenplay Instead, Bakshi informed them to animate funny scenes containing whatever and they'd work it in. Terrific.
As you can read in his introductory post, Harald’s goal for this blog is to help build a bridge between the academic and business communities on issues regarding climate change and polar research. Before he left, he asked a few of his friends and colleagues to contribute. Read below for the first essay, by Cornelia Lüdecke, PhD, a lecturer at the University of Hamburg, and president of the International Commission on the History of Meteorology (see the end for a full bio).
Long live the free,
Posted on the Vigil of All Saints, a.D. MMXI
Well, it turns out I don't actually want 'Me' time at all.
So, what do ya say, friends? Do you know of a Battered Women's Shelter or a Children's Home that could use a donation?
Zara is one of the few shops I would happily buy anything in there (IF I had the money to). I came across these images on Zara’s UK website and they got me really excited about finishing my roll of B&W film. I took my film Canon SLR with me to London a few weeks ago and only took a couple of images. I’m trying to save them only for the best opportunities but find myself missing out on moments.
You will be expected to produce a card every fortnight and take a share of the commenting.
11. All privacy invasive technologies (bugging devices, hidden cameras, smart meters, anything affecting thought or consciousness) are to be licenced, removed from ownership by civilians and may not be sold to civilians. Use to monitor criminals may be done in a transparent manner with records accessible to accountable government registered professionals.
The peat burns brimming from their cups of stone
And then a new realization crosses the faces of the purist fans: he’s a champion that represents his belt. He represents what he says he’s supposed to represent. His belt has a purpose because it is supposed to; it’s not just a fancy paper weight that distinguishes one talented kicker with another. Da Infamous DiZ, new “New Tigallo” champion IS the mantra. He has a purpose.
Nicolas Veron, senior fellow at Bruegel, a Brussels-based think tank, is not too far away from that: "This agreement does not set Greece on a sustainable track, and more pain is sure to come down the road …". Yet Mohammed el-Erian, co-chief executive of Pimco is more blunt: " … this agreement is likely to follow its predecessors and fall apart in the weeks ahead".
You might look at some of it and go, “wow!” Some of it might make you cringe and some of it you see and you just have to have. After all its art, a matter of perspective, one man’s junk is another man’s treasure, right? A visit to ARTE might not necessarily result in purchase but I can guarantee you will find some things that you’ve never seen before and some things that might even make you laugh (a crochet bikini did that for me). The sellers themselves are culturally diverse, the Russian who sold me the soap was sure I would return for more.
All three parts take us on a psychic journey, gaining so much knowledge. With each part, Francine gives us windows into the spiritual world and how things are seen from the other side of life. A truly fascinating read.
against, implies the wind
So yesterday was Mother's Day in America! Every mother was able to sleep in, get flowers, gifts,etc.
curry leaves & cilantro
Investigators said the couple had been having marital problems, which may have led to the shooting.
This spring break is going to so incredibly different from the last 3 spring breaks. Would you believe we the Boy isn't actually playing baseball? There will be no trip south to St Louis or to Memphis this year. As sad as I am about not going South this spring, I am even more excited for the opportunity the Boy has taken for his spring break. Today the Boy is left for the adventure of a lifetime! You see, this morning (baring any wildcat strikes from Air Canada) he left with 14 other teens and 3 teachers on a trip to Kenya! (Dear Air Canada, please don't mess this up for them!) As long as they can get to Montreal by Monday evening, then British Airways takes them the rest of the way.
Grade 8 = 1 hour
Now as is the case with most things it seems that pens have changed over the years (why wouldn't they ?) and they are thinner than I remember, at least the ones I have chosen to use, or maybe it's my fingers that have got bigger ? either way gripping the pens is problematic at times, I have had operations on my hands which has dulled the senses in my finger tips some what, this doesn't help.
The Split
Imagine if these were real illnesses with a problematic diagnostic co-occurrence and the American Medical Association decided to address the problem by simply denying the existence of half of them. Persons will still have dependent, schizoid, paranoid, histrionic, and narcissistic personality traits despite their diagnoses being deleted…
Neotame is essentially aspartame plus 3,3-dimethylbutyliii–the presence of which ends up reducing the production of phenylalanine, which allegedly makes it safe for those suffering from phenylketonuria (PKU).
Now and again I heard a tune called Sylvia by Dutch rock band Focus. I loved it and wanted it. I saw a Focus LP in the music shop in Crayford and my mum kindly went to buy it for me. Unfortunately what she bought was not the LP but some complicated Focus sheet music including yodels. Another embarrassing return to a shop ensued.
The 1938 edition of Action Comics No 1 - which originally sold for 10c - was sold by a private seller to a private buyer, neither of whom was named.
Across the way were two guys who work for a linen company.
My beautiful boy wants to read. He seriously wishes he could. He loves books - especially Roald Dahl and he brings them home from the school library every week. Plus he got a lovely set from his big sister Chelsea for Christmas and birthday. Plus he bought some second hand ones at Trash and Treasure. At the moment he has his beautiful gift copy of Fabulous Mr Fox, plus his crusty trash and treasure copy, as well as a copy from the library! I think that's a clear sign he'd really like to read Fabulous Mr Fox.
I didn't have time to wash my face when I woke up, Oscar was begging to go out. So, I figured, meh, whatever. I dont care.
Several letters following Wigransky's are quite interesting:
Day upon day and year upon year O city, walking your streets,
For more info on the author please click on the links below:
It was really good fun we chatted and laughed for about 30mins or so.
Pegs
(Photo, above: Chez Moeder Lambic, Ixelles.)
I felt that I MUST make a teddy bear to contribute to this goal. She’s provides a pattern in which each bear should be based on. But if you have the ability you can change the pattern textures to any you like. This sort of thing really appeals to me so I took it upon myself to create a teddy bear with lots of pattern and texture. I wrote this pattern down. You can find it here. Feel free to use this pattern for non-profit and is suitable for this project too.
These four gentlemen took a hike with me into McMaster University's Zone "M" parking lot to take-in the history of the area, and to share thoughts on the potential future of this former Royal Botanical Gardens property, now a car-park.
definition of the black universe in III.1 represents and expresses the objective realization of the truth of the dreamy khoric universe-thought, the disclosure of the non-transparency of the noetic sense of universe as the non-transparency of the Real itself, that is, the absolutely ineradicable radically immanent universal truth that is by definition beyond and foreclosed to thought. These two definitions—the definition of the universe as an opaque, solitary thought and the definition of the black universe as the opacity of the real—translate, across the space traced by the shift from opaqueness as adjectival property to nominal thing, between the sleep of mere conscious being to the wakefulness of knowledge or science. Where the universe is a kind of thought that is present in the human simply by virtue of its event, an awareness-birth that bounds animally through its own advent and provides the dreamless dream space wherein man’s eyes are opened, the black universe is the waking revelation of universe seen according to the Real, the blind vision through whose open eyes universe itself is shown to be a ‘color’ in an analogical sense, namely, an ontological blackness or truly existent appearance that demonstrates Reality’s invisibility. Black universe is the substance of an analogy that may be clarified thus: Black is to color as universe is to the Real. Black is the color that is not (color). Universe is the real that is not (real). Here the positivity and priority of opacity becomes evident. Just as opacity is the condition of thought that discloses universe in the first place, so is it the ‘means’ whereby thought touches its universal object, seeing at once (and as if endlessly for the first time) that it is and that it cannot be seen. As black is literally a mystical or hidden color, the color seen where there is no color to be seen, black universe is the mystical, in the sense of an eclipse of what by that that reveals the universal Real: “Not how the world is, is the
We will persistently clarify the choice before every ruler and every nation: The moral choice between oppression, which is always wrong, and freedom, which is eternally right. America will not pretend that jailed dissidents prefer their chains, or that women welcome humiliation and servitude, or that any human being aspires to live at the mercy of bullies.
Each article a dead man or woman, their bodies – or parts of their bodies at least – found. Suggestions, hints, daring allusions to the fact that some might have been eaten. Other articles, items, from the Sunday papers, series on human monsters, Fish, Chikalito, Dahmer, Meiwes, arranged around these more local, more recent cases.
Bake at 325 degrees (make sure you don't do 350) for 14-18 minutes (check them!) until they just start to look light brown on top. This recipe will make a big batch. I put them in my freezer and eat them right out of the freezer. This is my favorite way to eat them!
Keep smiling – it makes people wonder what you’ve been up to. ~Author Unknown
Most conservatives I know HATE that proverb anyway; they lament any kind of “grey areas” or “moral relativism” – THEIR ways are good, period. To them, there even is tremendous danger in trying to understand (and even perhaps, God forbids, forgives!) someone who does things contrary to their frame of reference: at the end of that evil tunnel, society will allow zoosexual weddings…
Are these kneejerks what passes for thinking in the Guardian ghetto?
very SPECIAL day!!
Clive Simpkins is a marketing and communications strategist who helps people and organisations communicate better. Whether interpersonally, for press, radio, TV or social media.
Surrender can open that door for you. Complete acceptance of it. So honor that sacred dimension and realize that what your mind is saying, that it isn’t right, is just a form of conditioning – it isn’t the truth. It is supremely right.
The good news is that I have finally reached packing nirvana. This can only be reached when you get to a point where you travel enough that you always bring the same stuff wherever you go. You just don't give a flying fuck what you pack because, let's face, it, you will hate everything you've packed the minute you get there anyhow. When I try to get creative with my travel wardrobe, it always goes wrong, so I now can pack in ten minutes flat because it's always the same stuff. And then I get bored with it all, as usual.
It seems obvious that the Samsung Galaxy S III wouldn’t have raised as the new standard-setter without a powerful challenger like the One X. There’s no consolation prize here, no second-best. A fair fight and a win-win for Android.
Eco-friendly my ass.
Repost from February 21, 2012:
It seems that there are certain headlines, certain ideas or themes that are so compelling for some journalists that they will throw all of their critical thinking and basic research skills overboard and jump into it head first. You know the type of article I’m talking about: “Cat Called for Jury Duty” is a classic. Within hours, it’s been copy-pasted from newspaper to newspaper, even though the real story is much less interesting than it sounds (and in this case, a year late at that).
A lot can change in a year and still remain the same.
The manager could have used the incident to talk with the salesman about the importance of projecting a professional image. Instead, she talked to another team member about how disturbed she was about the poster.
1. Two Saturdays ago, Princess and I spent mommy and me time shopping for stickers that Lacy found at Dollar Tree. Granted, we had to go to three different Dollar Trees (Dallas, Plano, and Frisco) to find them. We got Stations of the Cross, Mysteries of the Rosary, crosses and crucifixes, names of God, and Christmas/Nativity. They also have Jesus and Mary stickers too, but we already had those. The sets come four sheets to a package. What a deal!
There’s time enough to meet friends here,
He rode a Java motorcycle that would ‘fly’ really low to the ground and if you were riding pillion it could be your last ride to he.. you were so close to the ground!!
The housing market has enough policy uncertainties today. We hope this false rumor concerning a 3.8% sales tax on home sales is not among them.
“All praise be to Allah”, he announced after the result. Yes, indeed, Allah was by his side, always on the watch for deviation, keeping an eye out for any who dared to vote for another candidate. If they did, George the pseudo prophet warned, they would have to face Him on Judgement Day.
It was a scary thought.
Now, when I see others with this kind of fundamental faith and belief in their religion, I find it equal parts scary and admirable. Maintaining that kind of faith and devotion requires a surrender to an intense myopia that I can't even imagine. It requires that you view the world in terms of absolutes: Black and white; Yes and no. There is no room for shades of gray or maybes in a mind filled with the idea that there is only one path to heaven.
Parvar, one of the regime's most radical military commanders, is in charge of all Guard forces.
He stared down at her, then put both hands on her shoulders. “You’re shaking. What’s the matter with you?”
I probably should clarify that as well as sourcing and growing the vegetables, it is also Garry’s job to cook the vegetables, and he thinks the ricer is just brilliant… Men and their toys? Or perhaps he’s just got the taste for delicious mash and can’t look back.
conduct and should have reported it to the Corrupt Practices
She was trying really hard, but she looked awfully awkward, and definitely not sexy.
I haven’t seen the weather for Saturday if it don’t rain,I will be there at the market,how bout you?
"I wish I could dance," she whispered. "I wish I could two-step. I wish I could one-step. I wish I could waltz like a princess! I wish Wish WISH I could dance!"
Taken on January 30, 2011 with a Canon PowerShot A2000 IS.
….because I’m pretty sure it isn’t me. I know this because Hardscape often says he is and it is often followed by don’t blog that, okay? Clearly sometimes I have listening problems and some thing are just necessary to blog about.
ROBERT DUVALL (TENDER MERCIES)
It’s easy to take for granted the incredible technological achievements of the past half century. But we shouldn’t. If you stop to think about the things humankind has accomplished, it’s truly staggering.
There, he took that much better.
The other night I was out drinking with my friends, and after a few too many, I ended up shitting myself. I’d fallen asleep on a chair in the same room everyone was in, so there was no hiding it. They were pretty sympathetic, but I went home as soon as I woke up and now I don’t know if I can face my friends again because I know they were all laughing at me after I’d gone.
The Proenza Schouler ‘Tiger Print’ Sweater retails for $545.
Granted we generally watch some of the documentaries and always have discussions about the Anzac's and war in general, however we have never gone beyond that.
Given the logic of the Minister’s comments in the Dáil last week, section 4 should be deleted and should only be re-inserted after the enthusiastically awaited Scandinavian model of child care is in place in December. Goodness me, we might even support her implementation of some of these measures at that point, but there is no justification or logic for implementing them prior to that time. On their own, they can have no other effect but to drive lone parents out of the workforce and into full dependency on social welfare.
Very often I thought you were weak..proud with every single thing I have..I am boasting myself..
I say if you plan to give a gift card, why give a gift at all? I am not saying all gifts need to be magnificent. I think of Queen Elizabeth’s gift to President Obama: a pen and stand made of timbers from a slave ship. What did this say about her character, their relationship, and her estimation of him? (and what did his gift of an iPod to her say about the same? Quite the contrary answer!)
The anger I feel ebbs and flows, fluctuating depending on my situation and surroundings. It is certainly not all I feel--I am constantly countering it with forgiveness, but I know the importance of really feeling anger to help heal and move on.
I made a card today for challenges on Late Night Stampers and Scor Pal Pals (yahoo groups).
It was only on Friday, three days after the shooting, that the truth finally emerged. The Russian newspaper Kommersant reported that Mr Gorbuntsov had been the victim of an attempted murder in London, and the British media were at last appraised of what had happened.
“Look, she has learned how to wash correctly. I wonder who taught her this.”
Today's first batch was a partial mash Dubbed Stone Soup XXI Ale, the Mustachioed Dark IPA (MB0021). I brewed this batch using leftovers from previous batches and a lot of hops. Everything was going well, until I had a stuck sparge. Grain hulls clogged up my mash tun's spigot, causing me to forgo a second batch sparge and add water to bring the boil to volume. Other than that, it was all good.
Kona Brewing Co Kailua-Kona, HI Wailua Wheat Wheat Ale brewed with tropical passion fruit. Way too light. Terrible flavor. This may be the worst of the bunch.
Well, I guess it could be party of two if I’m not careful and pass along my “gene” to Clementine. But alas, I find myself with many inner ramblings and things to say, sometimes so much so that I feel like I might explode. Since I’m no longer paying a therapist to listen to these rantings of mine, you – the lucky readers of my new blog – will reap the benefits of my poor attitude expressed in the written word.
1. start by cutting a toilet paper roll in half length wise.
Knowing me, I will probably write about the my need to heal my relationship with my "brothas".
Mancini’s managerial credentials should be questioned, but they are not because he can use the Balotelli sideshow as a shield. It is a debate for another day, but Mancini’s faith in Balotelli has detailed a major flaw in his ability. I wonder if this would have happened at Old Trafford. Would Ferguson allow a 21-year-old to be so publicly vilified? Did he allow that to happen to a young and imprudent Wayne Rooney? No, he protected him through some brash episodes and barren Premier League years and he has emerged a more reliable character. Who expected Rooney to go a domestic season without a yellow card five years ago?
"We got our table two days before our first Thanksgiving in this house and we were hosting, yikes! There wasn’t much time to figure out the chair situation. I tried the Craigslist route but I couldn’t find six matching chairs that didn’t include arm chairs. We decided to go with simple Windsor chairs from the unfinished wood shop for $45 each.
Info sessions in C-101 Padelford: Tues 4/10 at 12:30 & Thurs 4/12 at 3:30
Rasheeda and her husband Kirk Frost will reportedly be the headliners on the show. Frost manages Rasheeda in her music career and also partners in her “I’m Bossy” accessories business. The two have managed to maintain a successful relationship thus far by keeping it OUT of the public eye.
Spoiler's Death / Leslie Thompkins' Character Assassination- It sucked, people hated it, it went away.
In a conversation about todays social media someone asked me if I had a lot of friends and I answered him “not many”. I further explained that most of my “friends” in the social media context are family; I have a few past co-workers that I keep in touch with and a few people who I have known since I was a kid, a few that I’ve met along the road of life and a few terrific ones that have accepted me as a package deal when I married my Wrangler wearing man!
Garden Trellis Background.
I felt like Humpty Dumpty who had a great fall.
1:20-2:10: Grade the four papers I didn't get to over the weekend. (This feels like it takes longer than it actually does.)
Now I don’t much care who Bristol is dating these days but for a party that refuses to recognize gay marriage, this latest move to remain relevant smacks of so much hypocritical “doo doo” that hip boots are needed to wade through this tripe. This is the young woman they hold up as a “role model” to young women struggling through their teen years who may find this an acceptable way to assert their independence by following Bristol’s lead. Disaster lies this way.
damned little poem!
I already had the gift sack on the left assembled and ready to go. You can read more about them in this post. In that sack I packaged up some small candy bars + an iTunes card. I had another bag of candy that I wanted to add and could have easily just tied this to the first sack with a ribbon. But I decided to make the gift even more fun so I tucked the candies into the "goodies" sack.
Ted is a journalist who has uprooted his beautiful wife Laura and young daughter Amy in search of a story. His best friend Alex, who resides in Japan, found them the house for a real bargain. Because, he says, the place is haunted.
1/4 cup chopped fresh herbs (parsley, thyme and basil are all good)
Yes – I have another giveaway opportunity! Hope you had a great Valentine’s Day!
Generally, an active adult needs "between 2000-2600 calories per day, more if very active. Children need 1500-1600 calories per day to maintain growth and energy" (See 14 Tips for Food Storage Shopping). So taking the calories you need per day and multiplying it by 365 days in a year, an adult would need between 730,000-949,000 calories in one year. A child would need between 547,500-584,000 calories in one year.
The most effective route to eradicating small talk is to lie, lie, lie through your teeth until they corrode from the sugar of your sweet, silver tongue. Since I am traveling, I can be a different person every day, every hour, if I so choose. If I claim to be an ethnobotanist, or Thomas Malthus, then we can very quickly move on to more fulfilling discourse. Yes, I lie, but it is for the good of the people. I am practically a philanthropist.
RPC Analyst Chris Jacobs
Promotion Details: Buy two Simply Sent Kits and get a FREE coordinating stamp set! Our Simply Sent Kits are the ideal choice for the beginning crafter. The card kits offer a variety of basic themes, so it's easy to create cards for any occasion.
BECKMAN FRIEDSON J. Flu vaccination – a moral responsibility for nurses? NurseWeek News, 2005. URL: http://www2.nurseweek.com/Articles/article.cfm?AID=18904
Xypherous: Passives that affect auto-attacks.
Their so-called religion is, as some prominent leaders amongst them have in the past frankly admitted - "Judaism is not a religion but a Law religionized." Moses Mendelssohn - simply a DIY kit for subverting, undermining, corrupting, profiting from and ultimately enslaving the hated Goyim. There is no spiritual content at all: the nearest they get to that is the maxim which outwardly observant ones amongst them - in other words, the biggest hypocrites, such as the Eskenazis and Silverstein - hold dearest to their hearts: "when Moshiach comes, all the gold of the Goy will belong to Jews".
Boating on Kodai Lake
The crowd start hollowing and booze starts flying.
On most birthdays, I am reflective. I look back on the past year and find fault in nearly everything I have done and promise not to make the same mistakes.
and leave to Mary all the rest.
The Half-wayers put their conscience on indefinite leave upon unspoken orders from their rich employers or sponsors. They always look for other unhealthy means to release their internal frustrations, disrespect, and disgust. These vents might include: eating; sex; violent sports; consumption; or peer socializing.
I'm going to assume that I at least was in a group that was a step closer to an interview? maybe? who knows...either way, these emails kill me because I get my hopes up when I see the non-generic looking email that I get about 10 times a day from the jobs I've applied to. It makes it all the more disappointing.
“Metrosexual man, the single young man with a high disposable income, living or working in the city (because that’s where all the best shops are), is perhaps the most promising consumer market of the decade. In the Eighties, he was only to be found inside fashion magazines such as GQ, in television advertisements for Levi’s jeans or in gay bars. In the Nineties, he’s everywhere and he’s going shopping.”
After the paint dried (overnight), I cut the bunnies out and Nathan glued the bunnies to a sheet of blue construction paper. We also cut some green grass to glue along the bottom. We cut slits in the green paper to give it a "grassy" effect. And then added a cotton ball for a tail. These came out So Cute!
He returned home happy, with a light tan and, thankfully, keen to tell us all about the trip. His case had been neatly packed, there were no hideous surprises and, as it was Mother's Day, he handed me a bar of soap he'd bought at a local soap factory. 'Yeah,' he said, 'our teacher gave us the nudge that we should all probably buy our mums something from the factory shop so here you are.' Lavender. Not my favourite scent, if I'm honest, but hey it's the thought that counts, or, at least, the thought of his French teacher. Merci beaucoup, Monsieur.
These are super simple to make!
Well first off, the characters! I really liked Kate. She's a reader, a lover of the arts, witty, just a fantastic heroine in all. I also liked how even when she was with Vincent, she didn't go gaga and still remained sensible in tough situations. She wasn't overbearingly whiny about her parent's death, and her grief over them seemed realistic and well-written. Jules is one of my favorite! Although just a bit rough in the beginning, he starts to sweeten up and just become so adorable.
The canal near to our house, long disused*, has been the subject of much debate in recent years, with applications for grants and subsidies being made in order to get it up and running again.
Whether it are the architectural details at ancient
*cough*
March 30, 2012
T: yo, I can't believe you went to her dorm. this is just some college girl who came to your show, right ...?
And because the purse hangs down low, I remove it and set it on the tiny ledge in the portapotty and turn around to, well, do my business.
Gordon, my musical friend,
If the Obama government really wanted to motivate more qualified young people to go into science and space research, it could have killed two birds with one stone by better guarding the national interest versus the vampire squids of Wall Street. For more scientists may be found not through some community kolkhoz or disaffected racial minority cell, but by drawing to careers in science those already equipped brain- and education-wise. As it stands now, one so equipped can make $500k a year as a quant justifying with fancy formulas the leveraged insanity of the TBTF (“too-big-to-fail”) looters, or $50k as a scientist with NASA.
hiding this immense moon
but I want you to be wise about what is good,
Wow, lots of questions! That's cool. Thanks, everyone! As it is, I'm splitting it up into several different posts. This one will be more general questions and the next will be more science related questions. Then I will write a post about why I became a geologist.
Well at least I got my exercise for the day! I wished I had my knitting with me—I could have completed most of the sock foot! I didn't have any knitting, or for that matter, anything to read—so I just looked out the window at semi urban main street—for most of the trip --from Nassau county to Queens county--Hillside is a major commercial strip.
“The Caton Team is A-Number-One in our book. Susan and Sabrina are consummate Pros. They do exhaustive research, they know how to price a home in today’s competitive market, and they know how to stage a home for maximum buyer appeal. They’ve sold two homes for us, and we’re completely satisfied with everything they do. You go, girls!”
There's a visual freedom about this one that is at times exhilarating, most notably its interpretation of the Ghost of Christmas Past episode: years of Scrooge's memories compressed into one dense 12-minute long take. Could that kind of complicated camera move have been accomplished nearly so easily with live action? I doubt it, and according to Zemeckis himself in this New York Times interview, that's the kind of freedom he finds appealing about digital performance capture. But what's welcome with Zemeckis's Carol compared to The Polar Express is that the technology is, much of the time, placed in service of putting across a fresh and astonishingly faithful interpretation of Dickens's traditional holiday chestnut; despite a few regrettable episodes which, like much of the first half of The Polar Express, feel more like a theme-park ride than a movie, human warmth isn't totally sacrificed. Unlike Avatar, technology serves the story, and not vice versa.
I offered her a cookie. She took it, but held it in her mouth without chewing. The superstar showmanship pony knows there is no eating when she's in her showmanship halter... I've created a monster!! I scratched her some more and offered her another cookie, which she took and held in her mouth. It wasn't until we walked off to do the cones again that I saw her chewing.
ISBN: 0786838183
Plenty of sighs
4. Conspiracy Theories and Interior Design: What? I don’t know! I loved how this episode tried to resolve, or pointedly not resolve, the fall out from the Jeff and Annie kiss while getting to use Joel and Alison’s ridiculous chemistry to boost the genre of the week. (Intro to Political Science should have been taking notes.) It also made amazing use of the Greendale setting by incorporating the unique faculty in the A and dorms in the B. From Professor Professorson (it’s Dutch, I think it means Professor) to the very end this episode was non-stop fun.
But behind me lurks a waking nightmare... Of course the tidying of one room simply means transfering the clutter into another room and there it remains. All my beads, boxes, half-made jewellery, tools: Chaos. Guess what I'm doing tomorrow?
We had an OB appointment yesterday, we're now 34w 5d, and bubs has decided to turn from breech to transverse.
Not to mention the many trophy Bows we caught last year.
“That is just load of shit you’re speaking” He lit a cigarette out of frustration from this long conversation ever since they entered the bistro in the Village. “This load of shit I’m speaking my parents paid tons of money to have me fed.” she said smiling and carried on “How do you know one entered heaven and met God just because he has been good or not? I mean seriously Daniel, you never know anyone very well. Everyone has a dirty secret they like to keep buried in their backyard, we’re not all angels in human flesh” He puffed the smoke from the cigarette “So basically what you’re saying is, we’re all going to hell, might as well be bad?” She looked frustrated. “No, all I’m saying is, never expect just because someone to be good all their lives, ends up in heaven, I mean they bound to have screwed up along the way at some point. That’s all” He sat there for a second and then said “Let’s put aside all this philosophy crap and talk for real: Claire, do you believe in Heaven and Hell?” “Of course I do, we all have to believe in them otherwise, and we’ll go insane and end up losers like you” She said half-heartily. He asked her again and she replied “I don’t know, I mean sometimes I do and sometimes I don’t. But all the people that I meet and hear about what others have done to them makes lose hope in them and in God. Like, why would God create people that’d kill each other in wars and stomp onto each other for their gains?” “Oh witty Claire, because they’re humans. Look, the way I see it, we’re here in this world, on this earth, to learn one thing and one thing only and people simply fight and stomp on each other hoping for the answer in these conflicts.” She looked at him deeply and said, “What are you hoping to learn in this world, spiritually lost Daniel?” He laughed a little laugh “Well, I’m hoping to learn, where the fuck they buried Alexander the Great’s tomb.” She laughed with her entire body, the kind that showed her innocence and then he asked her the same question, she replied simply by saying “I guess, to just find out what it means to be in love. To be really in love.”
The first winner of challenge 54 is
--3--
Kamil Mezalka then grabbed a two-foot-long samurai sword and told his stepfather to get off of his mother, according to deputies.
1/2 cup spelt flour
Woke up this morning from a dream. Judge Crime, all sour-faced, was sitting on a street corner near an entrance ramp from 490 in his flowing black robes, brown at the bottom from collected road dirt, holding a piece of cardboard with words hastily scrawled on it. As you get closer to him, you can read the marker: “Will adjudicate for food.” If you have to stop for the red light, he will run up to you with some old legal books soaked with his tears and snot and try to squeegee your window with them.
Every day. All summer long. Until I was fifteen.
Here’s this week’s Newsweek cover just released by Newsweek via Twitter.
I was having some anxiety and just didn't feel well. I teared up a few times, I didn't want him to feel it. He knows I miss him and that it's hard on me.
Though I still think Germaine gave us good advice when she suggested I get to the hospital well into labour in order to avoid interventions, with Geekybaby I wanted to avoid the frantic 'We're about to have a baby in the car' experience. Though there was a long, long ten day wait for it to start, after being in labour for a couple of hours my water broke and recognizing the feeling from the last time, I knew the baby was clearly on its way, so we headed to the hospital. This time the car ride was much more relaxed, and after I checked in to the birthing unit at UCSF I was able to focus on the panoramic views from the 15th floor as I breathed through contractions. Germaine being in Ireland, we had had another doula, the fabulous Jessica Berman. Jessica's acupressure technique (on my hand, between thumb and forefinger) allowed me to foregoe even the gas and air this time. I had it brought into the room, and was comforted by its presence, but with Jessica's reassurance that it would just be a few more contractions until pushing time, I never actually picked up the mask. She also kept me hydrated with energy beverages so I didn't need any IV fluids. It felt great not to be hooked up to anything.
Combine ingredients in an ice-filled mixing glass. Stir and strain into a chilled cocktail glass. Garnish with orange oils, but not a twist.
I cringe, wondering how many hours she spent making it perfect.
We can talk about ideals, standards, morals and ethics, but let’s face it – getting them 100% right every time is for future, better policy and maybe even human evolution. Right now we need an understanding and resolution to the problem at hand. Should you, or should you not, reveal all the relevant data when it is yet to be published. You want to share all your data with the peers, but you also don’t want to risk the full ownership of your work. You don’t want others to take your ideas and publish before you do, but you also come to the meeting with the hope that you will gain from others’ ideas/comments about your work. The concern is even more acute when you, like me, come from a developing country where implementing the ideas can be slow, for a variety of reasons. I have heard people talking about sending an abstract to a meeting only when the manuscript is ready to be submitted. Is this the best we can come up with? What about the data that is exciting but has not become a full story? Should you present a new method or a new transgenic animal you invented but you don’t know what to do with it? What if you had wonderful beginning in a project, but you are not able to take it to the end point? Is it alright if others can take ideas from your work and take it to conclusion – after all this will help science and the society?
(Photo: AK)
“The respondent (Ndlovu) replied that he was selling the plots and that he was entitled to do so,” Roodt said.
One summer, he and Mom decided that they would drive west to Yellowstone Park. They drove out through the States, then went north and returned by the Trans-Canada Highway. I moved a hundred miles away from home for employment. My brother moved here for a while. He even tried the big city of Toronto, but he was a small-town boy at heart. He moved back to Hicksville, (not the one where Billy Joel was born and raised) got a job and a wife. Dad asked them if they would like to come along.
OK so all I wanted was for dear daughter to get ready for bed and stop wrestling with her Daddy. He wasn't much help. He needs a refresher course on what QUIET TIME before bed means. Approved activities include coloring, a board game, reading or perhaps a light snack and some TV. Non-approved activities include tonight's episode of HOT LAVA in which she was jumping, sweating and being dangling by her feet off of our bed! Argh!
It’s a little like a training session I once attended. I was told this very effective thing that I still smile about today. It’s simply, when somebody is pointing at you, one finger points towards you and 3 point directly back at them… so whatever they’re shouting about, more of it is about them, not you…. try it sometime….
Besides the list of some key nutrients that will contribute to reduce the incidence of cancer, I also will list a few veggies and fruits that are great to use on side dishes. Never forget your best defense is actually consuming nutrients through food. Consuming them, it helps you to fight / reduce the impact of any damages caused by a wrong grilling method.
Across the country, millions of Irish-Americans loathe vegetables because growing up, produce was boiled beyond recognition and then forced by threat of death into their reluctant maws. But take heart, my freckled brethren! It doesn’t have to be this way. Did you know carrots can be roasted? And broccoli rabe, sauteed? And spaghetti squash, combined with red sauce, mozzarella, and pine nuts to create something COMPLETELY DELICIOUS? It’s true. So, love your Gaelic Ma. Embrace her. Call her often. Just … try to forget her cooking. It’ll make this whole process much easier.
I've discussed the close relationships between brothers – but when the characters are not brothers, the lines get a little blurry. I almost left these guys off my list but bumped them up over McDreamy and McSteamy, because, it's Joey and Chan! J and C! J-Man and Channie (6x02)! These guys defined awkward best-friend 4eva male relationships for the comedic generation. A lot of the humor in the Joey/Chandler relationship stemmed from the homosexual undertones and their "girly" way of being friends (i.e. they actually shared their feelings). Their friendship sometimes strayed into ambiguous territory, but it was always done with a laugh: the most significant moment (in my opinion; there were a lot) to show this is when they get the chick and get into a very domestic argument parodying parentage:
What a busy week this has become Lol! with the shopping list, chasing my beautiful Grandson Kiyren and trying to create gifts for my family and friends :) I have a super fun set of gift tags to share with you all that is showing what I do for my holiday tags to place on gift bags, treat boxes, and other fun goodies.
and dry even in the Seattle rain
Wendy suggested a good garden wagon. I have to agree with this one. It has been on my garden wish list for a while now. They are so much easier and longer lasting than a regular wheel barrow..
UPDATE UPDATE: Also, feel free to ignore any of the rules above if you have sufficiently artistic reason for doing so. I'm easy like Sunday morning.
Eventually the band felt they were ready to make their way out to the west coast. But first they needed to record some songs because you couldn't get a gig at the Whisky A Go Go unless you had a record out. So in 1979 they went to a studio called Magic Rat. Jerry counted his money as he walked in the door and then told the engineer to give them $120 worth. Sure enough, eight songs got recorded that day!
~CE
Here are my finished rooms - the front room, the bedroom, and the kitchen:
I think reaching for the universal is a kind of a religious impulse. Though I am concerned with the first and last questions of spirit and sensuality, I find meaning and consolation in particulars. I am not so much trying to make the intimate universal as attempting to make the intimate graceful and particular.
I would have loved to have engaged with some of the stall holders a little more. I used to do markets years ago (but thats for another day) some would not even make eye contact – it was weird, and no way to sell stuff or even get valuable feedback on their work. Such as, hey – why do your bangles come in gnome size, don’t tall girls get to wear bangles. Just saying!
How does Jesus guide us? By the Word of God, the Scriptures of truth. John 1:1-3
Flaked Oats 1.000lb Adjunct 5.6%
This was a challenge unlike any I have faced as a food blogger.
Do you use any type of writing software? I've recently been playing around with a few of them and I would like to let you know what I have found so far. Of course, this is all based on my very unprofessional opinion after all. :)
Having said that - I think I'm going to have to make time to eat a really big piece of cake.
+ PHASE ONE – Single
Ava is a very logical kid. If you have a fourhead, why wouldn't you have a fivehead? or a twohead or three head for that matter. We were recently in Michigan visiting friends who have a daughter the same age as Ava. Like Ava, she's a little smarty pants. She does attend preschool, but advised me in no uncertain terms that although she does go to school, she does not NEED to go to school. She's the smartest one in the class...and the teacher's favorite. She and Ava were assisting with brownie making and assigned the task of stirring to the count of 10. Miss Smart says to Ava, "I can count to 1000!" Not to be outdone, Ava replies, "Well, I can count to 2010!" (Now, Ava constantly throws numbers at me asking if it is the biggest number ever. 2010 (twenty-ten) is a current favorite. I thought it was because of the year, but I was wrong.) Miss Smart says, "There is no 2010." Ava says, "Yes there is: 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 2010 (twenty-ten)!" No response. Soft laughter from me and Miss Smart's mommy. Later: reminder to Ava that 30 comes after 29. Days later: we counted to 2010 again. Another reminder that 30 comes after 29. "Mom, I know that but I like to shake things up." Seriously. She said that. She's still 4.
How do you like them apples???????????????????? Well there is more and Denmark has a non-deductable Value Added Tax (VAT) that we have so far avoided in America. This tax is applied every time something changes hands. It is only 25%. If you are unfamiliar with a VAT tax, you best get acquainted as this will be the next method to squeeze more out of everyone and will just make the poor people poorer.
Shower gel
They throw in Drummer Hodge, to rest
For the first time in my 27 years, I found a place that feels like home. A place that I can always come back to and feel comfortable with friends who are excited to see me. This is why I live here.
A cow and a calf were captured to go
leap years, live
1st - Thou shalt sport a combo Mullet/Mowhawk
Sources indicate that one of the most recent transactions has been the sale of a property in the City’s Finsbury Square(technically the building is in the London Borough of Islington but it is effectively part of London’s financial district). Royal London House at22-25 Finsbury Square, EC2 is understood to have gone “sale agreed” for GBP 25m (€29.5m). The building has 89,157 sq ft of partly-tenanted existing accommodation , but there had been plans to redevelop the site and double the accommodation.
On the back of these much anticipated sporadic visits, and the fact that Robert has now seen my blog, he recently offered a very exciting proposition. How would I like to style some of his precious dresses to demonstrate how they might be worn?
The bespoke Autumn vegetable garden is bewildering in its beauty. We'd watched it being plated from start to finish, a process that seems to take about ten minutes for each table. An espuma gun is used for the base of pea puree before teaspoons of olive crumb nut soil are sprinkled on top.
"Potty. POTTY!" She screamed and wailed. I fully expected to see her head spinning around and green vomit spewing out of her mouth.
We went down the same fire road we came up. Got the water at one of the tiny creeks that was flowing from the mountain. It had this horse drinking bath contraption. But the water was still very good and clean. Pure forest joy. Much better than some of the bottled stuff they sell in stores. After the Johnson Trail camp the road turned into trail and that’s where the fun began.
We want to make a difference.
My maman suggested we bring a visitandine cake to go alongside the mousse, to which I replied that although I remembered hearing a lot about it, I didn't think I'd ever had some.
Step #1, Using Pixlr Editor. Once you know how to use some basic image editing tools, you will see those skills are portable. Most graphics software have similar toolbars and functions. This is a free service at http://pixlr.com/ that I sent you to in my last post to create fun graphics. Go back to Graphics 102 to see what we did in the Pixlr Express and Pixlr-o-matic.
Which leads me to a question–can we even call this a film noir if everyone ends up embodying the same character archetype? Does film noir require variety? It seems the definition has become so loose as the years have gone by, and the only reason Shutter Island gets to be called a film noir is because it has some noir elements. Then again, so do many other films, and they don’t get the noir stamp! I think this is just a psychological thriller, and the most noirish things in the film are Teddy’s fedora hat and trench coat.
This picture is a classic! Last Friday night Eli had a meltdown, wouldn't eat dinner and was freaking out to be on Adam's lap. I just had to catch this moment on film! Sometimes your Friday night ends up like this with a 19 month old and a newborn! lol
From Astute Bloggers:
Some critics, such as author John Clute, don’t consider many High Fantasy stories to be fantasy at all, and point to different literary form as the true bearer of the title. Why?
ORG/CONTACT PERSON: Sagip Kapamilya, ABS-CBN Foundation/Faizza Tanggol (09175323249)
“Even though Savannah went to Disneyland with the choir last year, all her friends are going again this year and she’s willing to pay for half the cost of the trip from her savings and Christmas money. I think we should let her go.”
I think both of these statements are far too oversimplified.
"It's a simple enough question. Why do you love me?"
Velvet Underground All tomorrow’s parties US
This brew ranked a 36/50 in the Bluebonnet Brewoff and made it to the second round as a Specialty Beer, since it is an overhopped Blonde.
Pendragon: Forum ban.
she don't mind my hand me down sweaters
3. Add tamari & lime juice to your noodles.
The packaging might not be cool by recent standards but when a beer is this good, who cares?
Spence Campbell (REP) 1.17% 60
There are alot of resellers that wouldn't mess with such a low money maker. No, they aren't going to make you rich, but they are a cheap buy and seemed to be a easy turn around. My plan is to lots with 3 or 4 pair and hopefully resell them for around $15.
At dawn I unite with the breeze
In the nineteenth century the area was a hive of activity and other long-lost pubs such as the British Oak, the Hulme Street Tavern, the Premier Arms, the Standard Arms, the Middleton Arms and the Union Arms all stood within about 100 yards of the Spread Eagle. That a teetotal working men’s club in the area lasted only a few years during the 1860s should come as no surprise.
If you live in my house and are about 3.5 feet tall you can see things that us taller folks cannot. There is a multitude of scary “baddies” that currently reside under the beds, and they seem to disturb our peace right around 8:45 pm. They’re inconsiderate, these “baddies” cannot seem to observe our households’ strict rules regarding bedtimes.
Stir-fried onions and peppers were available as garnishes for the sausages.
In the New York Times this week, there’s an op-ed piece called “The Forgotten Wages of War”. It’s written by John Tirman, who is the executive director of the Center for International Studies at M.I.T., and it deals with what is politely called “collateral damage”, as in harm that comes to people who are not, officially speaking, paid soldiers.
Belo Monte, with a capacity of 11,200 megawatts, is set to be the world’s third largest hydroelectric plant when it begins operations in 2015. The dam, one of the many planned for Brazil’s Amazon basin, has been criticized by environmentalists and indigenous rights groups who fear that the dam will increase often violent struggles over access to land in the contentious region.
So how do I do that? We as women have been conditioned to always be on the mate hunt. One date to the other, we are evaluating, planning, hoping, wishing, day dreaming and building sand castles in the sky about the next date, phone call, connection, love note and Facebook wall post from our love interest. Why can’t we just date?
Number of janitors with PhDs: over 5,000.
6. White Castle Chicken Ring
Dunya TV
In all, a week after Christmas, our only things tossed were some gravy, a small bit of roast beef, a bit of cranberry sauce that my kids eschewed, a small plate of leftovers my husband had fixed for work then forgotten (a miscommunication for us both), and the cheesy corn dip from a New Year's Eve party that had to be tossed due to being out for six hours.
(Now you see why this blog is called Mary's Meanderings- just a little example of the way my silly brain works!)
In 2009 I traveled abroad for the first time. I was terrified to go alone. This photo was taken on my first day in France after an excruciatingly long trip. (nearly 30 hours by air, train, and taxi) This picture represents a victory, of sorts, for me. It makes me happy because this was the day I realized that I could, indeed, do anything I wanted to do. Here I was, in a foreign country, thousands of miles from anyone I knew, and I was capable, happy, and excited to be doing all these new and wonderful things.
Well, that pack kicked booty. I might have to engineer a swap with someone across the pond for some baseball packs for a bunch of these.
If using fresh berries, clean and coarsely chop berries; blend with half-cup of sugar and refrigerate for at least an hour. Frozen berries can be thawed by placing in refrigerator the day before. Blend 2/3 of the berries in a blender until smooth. In a punch bowl combine berry puree, juice, water and Sprite and remaining chopped or sliced berries as a garnish. Serve immediately. (For casual gatherings, pour over crushed ice to keep each glass cold.) Makes 24 4-ounce( punch cup) servings, 18 6-ounce servings or 12 8-ounce servings. If you use regular Sprite and berries in heavy syrup, the calorie count is around 30 cals per 4-ounce serving. Fresh or plain berries and diet soda reduce the calories to a fraction of that.
Yeah, I said it.
Humans are entitled to security, running water, and health care. We aren't entitled to new iphones or a computer after two years. The right-wing warns us that Americans are selfish for asking for better wages but sees nothing wrong with scrambling for a new Xbox during Black Friday.
When interviewed by reporters afterwards, people routinely say, "I did what anybody would have done under similar circumstances." They might well be right.
Friday August 15, 2008 - 12:43am (EDT)
12. Five More Minutes - The Pennyroyals
On the way home, he told me that as he was standing in line, one of the cashiers rushed over to him and said, “Oh, honey! Are you ok?”
Craigslist, while an amazingly wonderful site to post items for sale, attracts lame ducks that don't show up to purchase the items they agreed to buy. At first this was annoying, but after awhile I learned to roll with it. We can't get mad at what we can't control. Who knows why people didn't show up. I tried not to be judgmental about it. And by the end I was even laughing about it. I'd just repost the listing, see if anyone else came along and try not to feel disillusioned with humanity.
superfluously like maiden aunts.
5 Ao amigo Tom
Although Franco steered clear of replicating De Sade's father and daughter partnership, he undoubtedly succeeds in creating an unsettling air of familial perversity, with shots of Eugenie's teddy bear reminding us that a hitherto innocent young girl is now approaching the dark side of human nature; an entrance that is marked by Albert's confession that he was forced to kill Eugenie's mother, in order to raise and groom his intended one true love (Albert's wife, and a third party named Valmont, both figure strongly in De Sade's novella).Soon, Eugenie is a willing accomplice in Albert's quest for the ultimate in erotic entertainment, though his demands will eventually lead to the realisation of his worst nightmare.
10 years ago, a sad young man who called himself “Lyle Stevik” checked himself into a hotel in Amanda Park, Washington and never checked out. 10 years later, nobody knows the name of the beautiful young man, or the motive behind his suicide. His only possessions were a toothbrush and toothpaste, some money, and the clothes on his back. He was to only stay one day, but decided to stay a little longer. He wrote on the hotel registry that he was from Meridian, Idaho with an address that belonged to a Best Western. He may be from my country (Canada), because he may have had a “slight Canadian accent” or an accent that sounds close.
We bought some dark brown caulk for places where the wood didn't completely touch the wall so it could be sealed. I was caulking today and it took all of my strength to keep from liking my fingers. It was dark brown and smooth and looked just like Nutella. Mmmm
Lower the oven temperature to 325 degrees F. Carefully transfer the logs to a cutting board. Cut logs crosswise, with a long serrated knife at about a 45 degree angle, into 1/2-inch thick cookies. Place cookies
Not the only one to miss out.
But I have a feeling only Whitey will be the target of any attempts at subliminal shaping of attitudes. Blacks will be allowed to continue consuming their very ethnocentric music, as will Hispanics and Middle Easterners and everyone else. Diversity and tolerance are requirements only for White people, and 'persuasive sound,' in Congreve's words, will be directed only at us.
At 0850 hours I ordered a press blackout. So far we've been reporting that contact was lost due to a malfunctioning relay satellite, but that won't satisfy them for long. We made such a stink about this mission at the start that the whole thing is ready to go to hell once they catch on.
3. I’ve begun a photography “business.” I can call it that, right? Since I anticipate being paid for the work I’ve been doing the last five weeks. Luwandi Photography: capturing life’s best moments. Currently working on a sports photography contract. Athletes are so thoroughly present in the thing they’re doing. So wholly alive, striving, completely focused. And that is beautiful. All the time. I aim for journalistic coverage other photographers might miss. Stories on the sideline. A particularly hard hit in practice. The instant a dad greets his son after a stunning win. The look of Mom’s worry as she’s watching in the stands. It’s great stuff.
And as far as the warriors of the 82nd AB who are involved go, I think G-d they're on our side. It's a pity they have to constantly watch their sixes for attacks from the rear like this one.
Some of you might of seen my nail polish storage upgrade blog post and saw that I have quite a few bottles of nail polishes.
It was a fun, relaxing, and hilarious weekend together, and we look forward to having Lauren come down to Baltimore for some serious lounging, snacking, baking, hijinx, and bally-hoo. We love you, LP!
“So all of us who have had that veil removed can see and reflect the glory of the Lord. And the Lord who is the Spirit makes us more and more like Him as we are changed into His glorious image.” 2 Corinthians 3:18
Ahhh my looking at these photo's I am also reminded of how much I need hair cut , I can't even remember when I had my last one , woops .
back and sooner than i thought!
Pepperoni pizza sounds exquisite, sort of like cold fresh water must sound to someone who's shriveled up and dying in the desert while the hot sun laughs and laughs in their face.
The Accidental Ballot Access Reforms
Down the Shadowvein picks up where The Pod Caverns of the Sinister Shroom left off, but it can be played by those who have not explored that module. Down the Shadowvein continues in The Mouth of the Shadowvein.
“Prometheus” is a nifty, action oriented episode in which Sgc finally becomes space faring. With the introduction of the title ship. There is yet again another vibe running throughout that the story is designed to wrap up dangling plot threads from the Showtime era. In this case, col. Frank Simmons and Adrian Conrad/Goa’uld meet their fates. ’Prometheus’ is considered the first part of a two part story, but considering how its tying up of loose ends has little to do with thor arriving to request help in defeating the Relicators, one wonders how dubious the connection between the two episodes is.
More recently, the NRC arbitrarily concluded these pools could store this spent fuel safely for 120 years.
These are ghost that we made from styrofoam balls from the dollar tree and cheese cloth. I have these hanging from the chandler in the dinning room and then some outside in the trees. My daughter thinks they have there mouths open like that cause they are hungry and they want some of our food.
Hi Lovelies,
* Fresh cauliflower is just BOOMING with vitamin C. 100 grams = 80% percent of your daily value! And Vitamin C = good for a lot of stuff :
Favorite YA book?
Given that last year's chaos forced cancellation of 100,000 flights, stranded millions of passengers, cost the industry $1.8 billion, and the global economy $5 billion, it is utterly bizarre that the authorities and the industry are not better prepared this time round.
Synopsis: Aliens have landed in David Gardner’s own backyard, but no one believes him! Slowly but surely the aliens are taking over his town! Can David convince the army to help him enter the alien spaceship and destroy the invaders? This movie is really fun because it has that feeling of paranoia about it, I’m sure the original 1953 film was made to reflect America’s fear of being wiped out by a nuclear holocaust during the 50’s. Tobe Hooper’s 1986 remake has the same feeling of paranoia, that feeling that you just can’t trust anyone because they’ve all turned into something else. Maybe it’s communism that’s taken over their minds? I kid, I kid. But seriously, this remake is pretty fun stuff. It has awesome make up and monster effects from the one and only Stan Winston. It has a fun vibe going for it and retains that old school sci-fi feel to it. It’s only draw back is the annoying kid they chose as the lead actor, but if you can ignore that, you should have yourself a pretty good time.
I think about these things when I should be more focused on the road. Even as all of this raced through my head, I was still tempted to pull over, because I thought it would be a solid joke to go up to the guy holding the sign wearing that enormous medallion and say, “Hey man, that’s an awfully big medallion. Is that gold? I’m pretty sure there’s a place around here that would pay you good cash for that... Not sure where though... Any ideas?”
Book lands on head. Ouch.
As the name suggests, the major part of the job of MP is sitting in Parliament, specifically the House of Commons. Parliament are responsible for designing new laws. The new law will be proposed, then read out in the House of Commons, where the MPs debate on it until they are happy. The MPs all vote on it, and if it passes it gets sent on to the next stage in the law-making process. That’s a topic all of its own, so I won’t expand here.
Week of April 23, 2012
08 in the mood
I can see from the beginning of time, way back to Adam and Eve, that our human, sinful nature is constantly and continuously driving us to be independent. We are always telling ourselves, “I got this. I can handle this. I don’t need anyone to help me. I can survive on my own.” This is the very thing the “American dream” is based upon…..you can do anything you set your mind to.
I honestly haven't forgotten about this blog over here! It's just been an insane week. We sang this song in chapel on Tuesday. I love it. I have heard it so many times, but this time when we sang it, it blessed me even more than usual.
Big gainers in 2010 include:
HAVE YOUR PROTEST MAIL HAND-DELIVERED!
Warren — who claims to have discovered more than 200 shipwrecks during his career as a treasure-hunter — says that bin Laden’s body is still at that same location, deep under water. His thought is that, since the Navy weighted down the bag, the body hasn’t moved from where it was dropped. He is now trying to rent Russian deep diving equipment to locate his payload, and to conduct DNA tests once he finds him.
A cigarette hangs from my mouth as I wipe away the condensation that has formed on the bathroom mirror in front of me.
Hurt is lingering near
I'm sorry that when you came home from church on Sunday, I had had an accident in my crate and when I saw you I got really happy and accidentally slid all over it and made a super big mess. You had to bathe me...and the crate. And then I did it all over again later that day.
Two weeks ago
To an entertainer, an empty theater is the saddest of all things. It is a shame more films are not as beautiful as Sylvain Chomet’s most recent masterwork, The Illusionist (2010). This is a film that is doing more things than most people will ever realize. At once it is a fable for the aging arts and it is also a fitting farewell from a film legend…from beyond the grave. Zombie movie? Like Chomet’s extraordinarily imaginative The Triplets of Belleville (2003), The Illusionist is an affectionate exploration into the world of vagabond vaudevillians and destitute dotards, but its tone is decidedly more somber and poetic.
The vet came out yesterday afternoon to reassess Echo. So far she has had three lots of shockwave treatment, two weeks apart, three lots of physio and two set of lateral extensions, as well as three weeks of long-reining and yoga. He watched her trot up on the concrete and felt along her back (where she is still quite sore). He then watched her lunge in the school and on the grass on both reins. She was rather excited to be on the lunge again after so long walking in straight lines so she had a bit of a buck and a charge around, but settled very quickly. And my goodness. The difference in her hindleg action is astounding. I had studied her movement so closely in the weeks leading up to first getting the vet out and yesterday she looked like a different horse. Whereas her hock action was jerky, with her snatching her hindlegs up each time - yesterday it was beautifully smooth.
But one of them, Caiaphas, who was high priest that year, said to them, “You know nothing, nor do you consider that it is better for you that one man should die instead of the people, so that the whole nation may not perish.”
I’m committed to the project of the organisation, I want all our students to have a host family before they arrive, I want the students and the families to experience a fruitful year full of learnings. I am therefore very tempted to work extensively extra hours. Yet I find out that if I work too many extrahours, in addition to my commuting time, I become quickly very tired, then in a bad mood, and not as effective and not that positive.
And, thanks to Fry, I’ve been let off the hook for making any further analysis.
Thanks. I'll stick to my vaporizer and suck it up. No pun intended
(1) The revised rules would require that second or subsequent continuation or continuation-in-part applications and second or subsequent requests for continued examination of an application include a showing as to why the amendment, argument, or evidence presented could not have been previously submitted. If an applicant cannot show why such matter was not previously submitted, the USPTO will not allow the continuation to claim priority to the original application.
“I’ll make your jeans vibrate like a Nokia”
If none of these images work for you, the best recourse I can offer off the top of my head is the Victorian Web an online amalgam of information. Or just googling images of "victorian parlours," or bedrooms, drawing rooms, and so forth. "national trust house interior" also had some good results, though not all of them are Victorian.
The shale gas bubble is the big economic story you haven’t heard about, though that will likely change in the near future. Behind all the hype about limitless shale gas are two simpler and noticeably less impressive realities. The first is that fracking technology applied to shale deposits can free up modest amounts of natural gas. The second and more important is that for the last half dozen years or so, at least, fracking technology applied to Wall Street has been able to free up immodest amounts of credit, providing the funding for an explosive growth in the natural gas drilling industry.
The rose was stamped with Kitchen Sink's rose set...I have not used this in ages so I was a little rusty with the 4 step process!! I also used Jen's Deconstruction sketch from 2 weeks ago...I thought the long stamp and sentiment fit the sketch perfectly!!
So, here I am at 2am watching "Friends" and blogging.
Racked: 07-29-2008
"No, Meg, but people are more than just the way they look. Charles Wallace's difference isn't physical. It's in essence."
It hit me like a ton of bricks. The word “Kudos!” has been taken from the old style greek and inserted into pop culture. All the while being used in an anti-christian context. I am sure the word “Kudos” was brought in by the greek fraternity system, where communism has ruled most colleges for decades now. After hearing all the popular frat boys and sorority sues using this term, people started using it only understanding it was mean as a compliment on an accomplishment. I first remember using and becoming familiar with the word when I was in the youth group at Sycamore View Church of Christ in Memphis Tennessee. It was in the youth group’s bulletin as a topic that listed accomplishments of different members of the youth group. That was 10 years ago! I am just now realizing how that was used inappropriately in an anti-christian context in church, today on May 5, 2012. I believe the church bulletin had the same “Kudos!” section but I am not 100% positive on that. It has been years since I have attended church there.
This is a great 20 minute video that I got it via email this morning and am finishing up watching it now. I've GOT to share this.
laying in the grass on a summer night
And so are the butterflies.
Savannah asked for an elephant so may I introduce Ebie. Once again I used an online pattern and modified it. If you click on the picture of Ebie you will be taken to my Flickr album and the link for the pattern can be found there.
about 5 cups of rice
A video less than three minutes took almost two hours to upload! Youtube prompted a new log in, then kicked me out claiming suspicious behavior. The midnight-hour deadline arrived and departed; frustrated in the wee hours of the morning, I shut down the computer and collapsed into slumber!
But it's true.
Winner for this weeks give away will be announced on Sunday!
NaHaiWriMo ABC Prompt Haiku:
Shag rolled onto his belly.
(His full name is Faisal Shazad and he lives in Karachi.)
The future
The coolest part of it all is when I showed Preston, my oldest, the email from one of the producers. He was more excited for me than I have ever seen him. Ever. It was so adorable that he realized my passion for something and connected the dots like he did. We happy danced together. A lot. I think he is my biggest fan, talk about melting a mama's happy heart!!
Like I said, my mind ran riot. So, it was nice to read every entry, and they all made me think, but Jeff's entry really blew my mind. Thanks everyone for entering, thanks to Greene King for the fascinating brewery visit and the bottle in the first place, and here's to more beer writing – may it continue to grow in stature, range and quality.
I have an awful lot I could say about that. I may bring some puppets.
LDI is, of course, Lawrenceburg Distillers Indiana. Located right across the river from Kentucky, LDI is a huge distillery but they distill on a contract only basis, so they don't release any of their own whiskey. Formerly a Seagram's distillery, LDI is currently owned by the financially troubled Angostura, which is in the process of selling it to Midwest Grain Products, a maker of neutral spirits.
When I saw the photo, I knew I was in trouble. Not a mousey cupcake stamp in the house! I took a ride up to my favorite stamp store in Ephrata, PA, cause I just knew that if there was a stamp to be had, this was my best shot. After checking every mouse in the house, this stamp was the closest I could get. It is called Heart Breaker. Even the store owner was shocked she did not have one.
Today's agenda: unpacking, returns, shopping, and a coffee shop date with my hubby!
Response: Blessed by the Lord our God.
Trimming that sucker down to a straight-edge rectangle was the only time during the entire process that I used a ruler (with the exception of the initial strip-piecing, of course). But what was I going to do with an 8"x24" rectangle? Add more black fabric, of course.
(thank you thank you thank you thank you)
For a long time I just tried to ignore it because I’ve known that I was supposed to preach for most of my life, but I knew I couldn’t do it as a deviant. As I listen to preachers and I hear the things they have to say about the LGBT community, I cringe. I’m not uncomfortable because of sin, I’m uncomfortable because it hurts to think that people I love and trust, could so easily hurt me and they have no guilt or shame about it. It hurts me to think of the people who deal with same sex attraction everyday can never find a place in the church because preachers and lay people think they are “diseased” (Yes, recently heard this in my own church, but not from my pastor)*. It hurts me to think that so many LGBT men and women will never want to hear the Gospel because no one is willing to reach them where they are. Preachers are called to declare the Word of the Lord, but God’s pulpit is not your bully pulpit. People have problems. People are hurting. You never know who is sitting under your teaching, looking for healing and receiving nothing but hurt from your words. It’s impossible to know how many people are depending on the grace of God in you to help pull them through. People die because of the things we say in church. People DIE.
him and you, you and I, I don’t do that dance no more
It means that our original expeditions are changed a bit, and also the expedition teams, plus I have a maximum of two funded places for my OPG guys per expedition, and that makes choosing who should go on expedition really hard as they are all amazing. Its also hard to know that some of them are wealthier and will likely have more opportunities to travel in life, whereas some of our guys will never have such an opportunity to visit another country, but it seems unfair to choose them based on financial background and opportunity and goes against everything we stand for, in making things fair for everyone. I’d hate it if we choose our refugees and IDPs over other kids who have maybe put in several hours a week on activities, just because they will have chance in the future. I also don’t want it to be based on age or ability in English, or to exclude people who are naturally quieter and therefore overshadowed by more vocal students, nor do I want just the scientists to go. Deciding is so hard. For some kids there is no doubt in my mind, and where there is no competition it is easy, but when you have ten kids equally competitive for one place, it gets hard, especially when emotionally involved and when you know how disappointed they will be. I feel quite mixed emotions right now, on the one hand I’m relieved and happy that any of them can go, and happy to have so many great kids to choose from, but equally sad not to be able to take them all. But if this goes well, there will be ample opportunity for us to take them next year, and all of them have asked us to start up a new project for them for next year as they wish to continue on project, so that is really positive.
103 heartbreaker
OK, now for the next one (I'm on a roll...), possibly called Fat Cat after a cat (yes it was fat) my parents had when I was younger...
we live in
We hope you can join Pasha Events & Barilla as we celebrate this incredible event together on September 15th in New York City’s Central Park!
So, what about you? Do you love dressers like I love dressers? Looking for that just right piece? Taking awhile?
I love the stories. The chance to read something before it’s published. I love being the person who gets to make that call, ‘you know your dream of getting published? Well that’s going to happen.’ I mean, who wouldn’t love getting to do that! I love being able to be a small part of someone’s success story.
I was absolutely blown away by The Life and Times of Scrooge McDuck. I’d heard it was good, but I didn’t expect this. Even if you don’t like the Disney Ducks, you have got to at least give this a shot.
Mark got two weeks pay on Friday, and I got my allowance, and for the first time Mark pulled in more than me, so he was smug for a while, and from June we’ll be on an even keel, so I hope that divide between us is over and out now, and we can forget about all that nonsense.
Do I fuss or fret any more? Very seldom. The storm of my soul has abated to a beautiful breeze on a lazy pond. I am a happy slave to His peace and righteousness. Every day the Spirit of God reveals to me that I am in His hands and I have NOTHING to worry about.
Facing the prospect of Championship football the American international will look to engineer a move back to his homeland. Injuries have blighted Holden’s career to date but the midfielder will arguably think himself too good for the Championship.
Carrie Ann: Yep! Each blog will have a different one, but here, I’m giving away a signed Swag Pack! Be sure to leave your email address!
3And the children of Israel out of their heritage gave to the Levites these towns with their grass-lands, by the order of the Lord.
So there I was...planning on writing a post that would probably start with something along the lines of 'Sorry, I've not blogged for ages' when I realised something...I am blogging. I'm blogging every bloomin day...just not here! It sounds stupid to say but I honestly had no idea that doing a drawing a day would take up so much of my time (Yeah, I don't know why that hadn't occurred to me either *slaps self on forehead*). I think part of the problem is that I am writing about what I'm thinking and what I'm doing as a background to each picture so to then come here and write about what I'm thinking and what I'm doing seems a bit...well...repetitive which would be fine if I was, I don't know, a circus performer (no, I don't know why that popped into my head but I'm going with it) who travels all over the world meeting interesting people but I'm not...I'm a community engagement manager who travels to Tower Hamlets! I do, however, have a plan (be afraid...be very afraid).
3. Yes, beloved souls, love is just that simple — allowing it to be! As often as the word love is spoken, written or read, it is possible — probable! — that the power of love and the many forms in which love is expressed rarely are recognized. Love and light are the two faces, if you will, of the energy essence of Creator, that most powerful force in the cosmos. Especially now, with so little time before Earth reaches fourth density, it is vital to understand that love is the key to every soul’s ascension. That is why I asked my mother to insert here the part of a book where she and I talked about love and light.
Tejun
Maybe they are just too weird. Maybe girls, for the most part, do not get them. But with hits like “Tom Sawyer” and “Limelight” and gargantuan efforts like 2112, Rush have certainly had a bigger influence than Def Leppard or even the Police.
may be i don't be his private teacher anymore but i do believe with his mother on his side he can studying better, have a comfortable zone..
country. The countries are then
Hoping that tomorrow I can find a more supportive and nurturing inner voice that might encourage me to finish the story before I miss the deadline!
Stop being your grandfather running a liquor shop in a black community and expecting to be loved for it.
They are the Anti-Christ.
To make the most delicious stock in the world, you’ll need:
10:22 PM – Johnny tells Eve that he does not think that The Big Show’s apology was genuine. Eve exits stage right to go tell Show. Meanwhile, Jericho, Del Rio, and Orton all believe that they deserve a shot at Sheamus’s title. After a brief scuffle, Orton confronts Sheamus for kicking him in the face, calling Sheamus a “clumsy ass.” Sheamus does not back down, telling Orton he will take him on anytime, fella. Due to the melee, Johnny Ace makes the decision to make the World Heavyweight Championship match at Over the Limit, a Fatal Four Way! Dope!
"theme" for the challenge! The Theme for this
The best
Make the Sweet Pastry Crust as instructed here. Roll out to approximately 1/8-inch thickness. Line lightly buttered tartlet shells – I lined 12 tiny, shallow 2 ¼ inch wide molds (in something like a cupcake tin) + 6 individual 2 ¾ inch wide tartlet molds for 18 tartelts in two sizes. Chill in the refrigerator while the oven preheats and the filling is prepared.
Palace spokesperson Edwin Lacierda says Malacañang is now investigating reports that an advance copy of President Aquino’s State of the Nation Address was given to ABS-CBN last Monday. Lacierda said the probe would be as transparent as possible. In fact, the public will have a chance to see the actual investigation… on ABS-CBN’s XXX.
But, I’m not because the kids are asleep, I’ve got a cool one in my hand, and the buds in my ears. It’s a Friday night dance-a-thon right here in my living room.
The practice went well. We made it there and back. Nothing was confiscated at the airport, so we got he packing right. However, we have decided to postpone our planned trip to the US as we consider that travelling to and in the US during the Autumn/Fall of the tenth anniversary of 9/11 is too risky, especially when the architect of it all has just come to a sticky end.
OF COURSE, i’ll still be reading and commenting on your blogs… just taking a break from my own.
The way it works is that a very fine mesh is placed across the affected area (in my case it would be the crown of my head) and fibre extensions are then woven through the mesh to create the required look. Your real hair is then pulled through the mesh and intermingled with the extensions, thus creating the illusion of a full head of hair. And they insist that it doesn’t damage your real hair, even going as far to say that in some cases the existing hair base can see a vast improvement.
What if that person was chatting up a good friend? The wife of a good friend?
Spanking is not a cure, and should not be the first resort, but I don't think it should automatically be taken off the table when dealing with small kids.
*** Vitamins: It is best to get as much of the vitamins and minerals you need from the food that you eat. However, your diet can’t 100% everyday provide 100% of everything the body needs. A complete vitamin is perfect for filling in the gaps. Because I am still nursing I am supposed to remain on the prenatal vitamins. When I am done nursing I probably will go back on taking some additional vitamins like extra vitamin D and coq10 for wrinkles but for now the prenatal suffices.
Jane C. Folger, 73, Bayonne, N.J.
There was trick or treating for everyone. Face painting, crafts, dancing in the streets!
dude.
Title Six
sings and all life listens
I’ve listed the Stages of Grief for a Suicide as well as Five Stages of Grief on my Articles page on this blog. They are similiar in some ways, but very different too.
me: "naw... as long as it is rational... ok i will tell you a secret. when i didn't know the music as well, i used to be surprised by the music, and that would bring me to tears."
And although this isn't my all-time-change-tune, it's from 1985. The Golden Age. Let's not change the dance, eh?
In a food processor add 1 cup of the black beans, cumin, chilli powder, garlic powder, black pepper, paprika, cayenne pepper and salt. Puree until smooth. While it is pureeing, add water. Add remaining black beans and pulse until chopped. I wanted this to be chunky so I didn't pulse very much. Taste and adjust seasonings accordingly.
Today I have the lovely Jullee from The Grubery sharing a yummy looking recipe. She has some gorgeous recipes on her blog so go and check them out :) Thank you for guest posting today, Jullee!
Things start clearing up as we near the ridgeline, and we passed another pair of hikers. The man said, "Ahh! Snow cat! Ha ha!" He sounded French.
... i'm there 3/4 of the day really ... when am i not in there making wheat free, dairy free, alternatively sweetened, organic food?
Paris: Call me Paris, Buff. How do I feel? Honestly? Hungover.
See how pale this thing was when I bought it? No bueno.
same as *Quantum-Interconnectedness* of David Bohm.
All right my lovelies, I've had a look at my previous posts about plots, and it occurred to me that, while they might be interesting to a writer who has already completed a few stories or books and who needs some advice about a fine-tuning technique for pacing and structure, it probably wouldn't be terribly helpful to someone still trying to work out what a plot actually IS.
Black Bean Burgers, Kristine-Style (page 128)
I seem to keep hearing about Six Word Stories these days, and I'm quite fascinated by them.
We have a poorly chicken (Madame Cholet, yes - named after the Womble) to keep an eye on, Mud Boy cut the grass the other day and I reckon she got hold of some of the grass as I suspect some may have flown nearby the chicken coop and she's stuck her head out and greedily gobbled it up? We shall see. I have dosed her with organic olive oil and prune juice.....all we can do now is wait. Until then I have kept her in the top hen house, cool, calm and quiet. Fingers crossed it works.
will get to choose a stamp set of their choice!
The Hurricanes - Isn't It Wrong
With 200,000 abortions a year we already have one of the highest rates in Europe.
The last blog I will mention is as different from the Alcatraz blog as day is from night. It is not about a single episode, is not academic writing, engages the reader, and was mainly composed in my head. Needless to say, I had a lot of fun with The Excuses You’ve Been Waiting For, and I have to credit all of the inspiration from a single episode of Untold Stories of the ER. With this blog, I felt like I finally had developed a voice that could be critical but funny, engaging but still informative. It also provided me with an excuse to keep watching Make it or Break it.
Hernandez denied beating the children but later acknowledged to a detective he may have hit the boy with a flashlight.
Unfortunately, it seems that America, a land where you could walk down the street without worrying about ever hearing those two phrases (unless you were guilty of certain heinous crimes like being swarthy in public) is as quaint a historical relic as those Saturday UHF reruns.
Kunal Roy Kapoor plays the goofy and bumbling cop. “It’s an amazing author-backed role, you’re going to love him,” says John. The film will have action shot in real locations in real-time. John seems super excited: “Producing films like these not only help me expand my repertoire, but will give me credibility as an actor.”
Step 5: Glue the wrapper around the candy bars and assemble basket. I used a hot glue to add just a dab of glue and they stuck really well.
So, at BRC, you can always count on us to cook up something new each semester.
Middle child: I don’t like skim milk at all.
It’s been a busy few days, what with continuing to work on my script, starting the process of writing the first draft of a novel and doing research for and working on an essay for photography and planning photo shoots. I didn’t intend to wait this long for part 3, but that’s life.
Let me show you how cool this stuff is. Here is her shirt...
Kanika began showing her work in 1993. Her mother joined her a couple of years later.
I’ll be honest, while I had a terrible relationship and experiences with my ado-mom, I kind of felt abandoned. When I had my kids during my teens, I didn’t have a loving mom by my side to help me and guide me on my new journey into motherhood. I didn’t have a role model. I didn’t feel loved, I felt lonely…abandoned maybe.
Nevertheless, more and more men and women believed in the Lord and were added to their number. As a result, people brought the sick into the streets and laid them on beds and mats so that at least Peter’s shadow might fall on some of them as he passed by. Crowds gathered also from the towns around Jerusalem, bringing their sick and those tormented by evil spirits, and all of them were healed. (Acts of the Apostles 5:14-16)
Since all of that stupid snap went down over the bad count (almost two weeks ago) I've gotten some pressure to do something about it, since I was the supervisor that night.
It took me two months after that lunch to work up the courage to go.
It seems unfair to introverts that they must spend so much time being something they are not when the extroverts go about life with carefree ease. Shouldn’t they have to learn to turn it down a notch sometimes?
So, in Chasing the White Dog, I decided to gather some tidbits along the way and present them as a series titled How to be a Criminal.
One of my friends describes this straight hair obsession best... she says we live in 'hair prison' and she is
I pray that Christ will make His Home in my heart through faith! Amen! I have my roots and foundation in love in Christ Jesus! Amen!
1/4 cup finely shredded Parmesan cheese
some hues we adored.
The dark, angst ridden stuff I wrote, back then, oh god, should I be embarrassed…..tonight is my last night in my current house, and so, all the old odds and ends and hidden boxes of souvenirs were finally pulled out from under the bed. And there it was, ‘the memories box’ – all dusty and ragged looking but still able to cast a silent spell of nostalgia over me. I hunched up to the wall and lifted the lid. Ryder Cup passes, Electric Picnic passes (the less sunny Irish attempt at Coachella) and other random cinema tickets, birthday cards and letters to loved ones when I lived in France. And then, there they were – letters and late night poetry to ‘The Boy’.
“I like the hair,” he said. The hair is good, much better, more like me, don’t you think? But,” he went on before I had a chance to lie in response, “I was thinking about what you said, you know, about jeans and a T-shirt. That’s what I usually wear around the house. So that would be the real me, wouldn’t it?” I nodded in agreement. “Okay, so keep the boat shoes with no socks, but put jeans on me, and a blue T-shirt. Make sure it’s not pink. And you can put my super name on the shirt across the chest.”
I am also a ‘jump in with two feet and think about it later’ kinda person! A lot of the time I will be doing an interview, presenting or, using last weeks example, teaching, and bang smack in the middle of it, it will dawn on me that I actually have an audience!
The this afternoon I went into my room (which is the room closest to her yard) and opened my blinds to see them putting up this “fence” on their side of the chainlink. Really? Then Brenna came in and said the lady told her they were putting the fence up so Jack wouldn’t see her dogs and cry more. WTF is her problem? She has absolutely no empathy for a toddler. My faith in the world is dropping.
01. So much trouble
“Whoa.”
Oh, it’s not strictly my fault. Jim Backus (Mr. Magoo…Mr. Howell…James Dean’s dad in Rebel Without a Cause) is as awesome as it is possible for awesome to get. And, while I’ve only ever seen an episode or two of I Married Joan, it is perhaps not unfair to say that she trails somewhat behind Lucille Ball and Gracie Allen in making an impression. Yet her resume is so impressive, it’s definitely got me wanting to take a proper look at her body of work… and thus may this guilty (or at least, abashed) soul be redeemed. (Though to be fair to myself, I’ve seen some of the movies she made and she left…no impression).
Yes, you’ve guessed it, the postman came and went and my alarm didn’t go off so now I have to wait until Monday to go and get my books from the post office. I even dashed down the road to see if I could find the postman, but I don’t know which direction he went and I only saw the collection notice about ten minutes after it was posted through my letter box.
In the meanwhile I put my plants out on the balcony again while the weather had become warmer. Also our pigeon couple seemed to get more accustomed to our presence and did not take off immediately any more when I openend the door. But they still flew away as soon as I came nearer than about 3 meters. And then one day, when I was watering my plants, I realized that Emma had silently built a “nest” behind a large planting pot with chlorophytum, that I had placed on another very large planting pot, that was filled with earth, just beneath the long leaves that were hanging from the pot. And she had laid 2 eggs. So what to do now?
There will be advanced copies of Devil's Kiss for sale and having been fortunate enough to read the book, I would recommend it highly.
39. The Vinyl Skyway-Return Of The Dead Surfer (Self-Released)
in a deserted place –
Let us stipulate here at the top: I don't like black IPAs. I find the combo psychically disconcerting, as if discovering that Rush Limbaugh suddenly became a PETA-loving vegan. The mixture of black malts and clean, crisp hopping confuse me, never mind the syntactical dischord of a "black pale." And so, while I'm about to rave about this beer, my opinion of the style hasn't changed. I will not drink a lot of this beer in the future, but that doesn't mean I can't appreciate and admire it.
I loved When God was a Rabbit, a story about friendship, growing up, love… and life itself. I am an only child, and when I read about how a relation between siblings can be, I am a bit jealous (although I know not all siblings have such a close relation as the ones in this book). Elly and Joe understand each other without words, and when this temporarily changes after an accident, she feels totally alone and insecure.
Dried fruits, I hate raisins but cranberries and walnuts, oh yum
I'm writing this at the airport in Barcelona. I left the same amount of time to get here as I did in Budapest yet I am over an hour early. My gate information still isn't posted and I've been typing for over an hour. Thus I sit, sipping my very last European coffee and listening to the British Tourists Abroad down the end of the table from me talk about their pregnancies.
behind an ambitious autocrat,
Pen. Malaysia (Weight: 2.40kg): RM19.00
1 large (57 grams) egg
And if you really are concerned about another person's weight, please actually talk to them. Don't try to get the message across in side comments and little hints. If it's a serious issue, then make it a serious talk.
Such endless inspiration ... Seriously, if you find yourself in the Big Easy, head over to Tara's shop, if only to dream. It was a delight.
Pionius
From the time of the promise to Abram in Genesis 12:1-3, the narrative of Scripture has been moving towards ‘rest in the land’ (see D J Clines, The Theme of the Pentateuch). And now, as the reign of Solomon begins, that goal has been largely achieved. This is the point being made in 1 Kings 4:
These didn't taste very much like the real thing but no one really cared! They were suuuper delicious in their own right and got gobbled up almost right away. For those of you who are doubtful/frightened by the Marshmallow Fluff, give it a chance! You'd be surprised at how awesome it tastes! hehe.
As you will see from the link below, the special information released to paying customers, which apparently constituted their "secret warning" of a harsh winter is a complete joke and comes across like something written by a child.
Those poor gray pears were just so drab, but a little craft paint turned that drab to fab!
He also was taken to the third heavens and heard incredible things from which emanated the revelations knowledge that flowed through his epistles such as who we are and what we have in Christ, the mystery of the Body of Christ and the gifts of the Holy Spirit. (Eph4:7-13,1Cor12:4-12 )
After our traveling adventure on Friday, we arrived in Scottsdale at 11pm (which due to the time difference felt like 2am to us) and we drove our Mustang up to the resort, not able to appreciate the amazing scenery in the dark. We drove up to the resort and was surprised by a giant vacant building (which turns out used to be the resort's restaurant. It has been between leases for several years now). The office was right around the corner but was dark, so we called the number on the door. Who I'm assuming to be the owner or manager came out of his apartment and greeted and let us in to be checked in. It was a nice break from your usual checking in to a hotel by employees with fake smiles. This guy was genuinely kind and happy to have us there.
We give thanks for the food of the land ... So that is my theme for this weeks' challenge
Republicans, too, are worried. It is a common theme among conservatives, the fear that Mitt Romney will commit the same mistake that John McCain did against Obama; the fear that Romney is “too nice.” I say that in a political context, but it is my belief that Romney's school boy smile hides an iron will.
The day after Thanksgiving, our holiday season begins. We put up and decorate our Christmas tree and try to put out all our decorations; like our blow-up snowman outside and our Rudolph stocking holder and nativity set inside.
And so my Writers’ Platform-Building Crusade was born.
The previews from last week more or less hinted at the reappearance of Mary’s father James Shannon, but I did not expect that ending. But then again, this is Mary we’re talking about who is all about doing the right thing. What happens next shall be interesting as we close in on what happened to James and why he’s in trouble now. So there’s my TwoCents, share yours below!
Being out on the water is where I find comfort, it has always been the place I turn to when I'm feeling low or over the moon happy...it's a part of who I am, and happily it has become a part of Mr. Tide and our children as well.
Now it’s time for the next best part of car singing: CAR DANCING. Oh yes, I took it there. Car choreo is very important because why bother taking all that time and effort to get ready to sing if you’re not really going to get into it? I usually limit myself to hand/arm motions or tapping out cool rhythms when driving for obvious safety reasons but sometimes you just can’t help but shimmy a little. And I say, embrace it. Embrace it good and just let it happen.
My wife and I saw him in Fort Worth last year. He opened with “Saturday Nights Alright for Fighting” and played a solid two and a half hours of non-stop hits. To show how timeless his music is, the crowd ranged all the way from High School age up to folks well into retirement.
I also started to make freezer mixes for my bread. I put everything I need except the wet ingredients in yogurt containers and freeze them for the next time I make bread or incase of emergencies when I need a fresh loaf for someone. It reduces the mess of taking everything out.
Today is day 9. I have been on the attack phase for 9 days. I have abstained from alcohol and I have been very strict in regard to the rules. I have been craving veggies so, I am moving onto the next phase. I was emailing Sandi with some questions and realized part of what I was telling her should be in my blog.
The next step is to get the trip approved by your administration and find out all of the procedures for field trips (buses, lunches, time constraints, notifying other teachers, chaperones, etc) at your school. Send out the permissions slips in advance with a stringent due date (I had a 100% turnaround on a one day deadline! I can NEVER get that consistency with homework!). The rest is watching the pieces fall into place…
Or the regime can commit an "Economic Waco," the way it has recently done to the Rick and Terri Reese family of Deming, NM. Read about this case, and ponder this federal engine of total destruction being turned against your family. At the same time the secret federal "law enforcement" (sic) program of walking thousands of guns directly to Mexican cartel killers was official ATF policy, and nobody has even been charged with a crime.
- No cry sleep solution
We ask ourselves, Who am I to be brilliant, gorgeous, handsome, talented and fabulous?
In East Dunbartonshire, the situation was the SNP as one of biggest parties, but suffered the same fate.
1 tsp. fresh-squeezed lemon juice
07 ON YOUR OWN (Billy Squier) 5'22
Basically, the problem with Thing 2 - and one that I saw coming a mile away - is that it has a little too much in common with Thing 1. I knew the plot of Thing 2 before I even saw it: people find the thing, they realize the thing is alive, the thing starts to kill, they realize the thing can replicate humans, they stop trusting each other, they die, the survivors fight the thing, they think they kill it but obviously they don't really because this is a prequel. DUH. And yup, that's pretty much what happens. No surprises, and nothing all that new is introduced to enhance the story.
He glances at Mackenzie holding her squirming son on her lap. Miguel looks like a mini version of his father, Dom, who is cutting the food on his plate into little bites. Alfonso, Dom’s brother, is sitting next to his daughter Zoe and they’re playing some kind of game on his phone.
Any commitment to democratic values necessarily means accepting a measure of instability in the top governing levels.
I've been sleeping, eating and drinking water all day!
Here would be an appropriate time to reflect on what the Avengers actually meant to this working class lad from Bramley. I often play my ‘brought up in the seventies in tougher times’ card but its hard sometimes to convey how important comics were to me when I was growing up. The weekly trip to the newsagent was a ritual that contained so much: anticipation, dedication, preoccupation and ultimately imagination. Comics loomed large because they burned bright in my life before girls and punk rock changed it all forever.
The TV Land Awards also features music icon winner Aretha Franklin singing “Respect,” “Chain of Fools” and “I Came to Lift Him Up.”.
Image: Drawn with a 0.25 mm Multiliner SP onto color laser copier paper. Sketch markers used: YG41, G21, G28, B32, B34, B37, N1, N3, Blender
An additional 19 percent cited other mental, emotional or behavioral problems. Today, ADHD is nearly three times more likely than asthma to contribute to childhood disability, the report said.
Four Dyslexia Centres on the Isle of Wight are to be closed by the IW County Council. The direct teaching service currently being delivered at these centres will discontinue. Responsibility for pupils with specific learning difficulties (SpLD) will move into Island classrooms. Schools will be given the funding to train classroom teachers to support dyslexic children within mainstream eductation. One part-time Dyslexia Centre teacher who will be made redundant has decided to work directly with schools and parents. Sarah Luke believes one-to-one direct teaching is more beneficial as it is her area of expertise. However, she does not explain how this will be achieved. Will funding be available for her to be employed by the schools? If not then parents only remaining option is to hire her to work with their child.
However without the shelter of being able to say “this is the right/wrong place/time for this” life becomes a bit difficult to avoid living and things become difficult to avoid dealing with when they actually happen - which is here and now and not at any other place or time that we have designated for it to occur to better suit us or so that we can avoid dealing with it at all.
3) Add the code below to your blog, so that others can post their projects here as well! The list will accept new links through Thursday, so if you make something new, come back and post it!
Wondering about the lost works of Dickens...like "A Christmas Bob", "A Christmas Ted", and "A Christmas Alice".
I was a bit of a geek and made my own little cut out heart to stencil icing sugar around on top too. They look way cuter this way...!
Its perhaps time - as Gallix implies, in his comments if not in the initial article - for us to look at the possibilities of eLit with new eyes: an underexplored arm of contemporary literature - and it has to be literature, not anima, or podcasts, or media art - that is still waiting for a writer or two to make it their own.
Kelsey worked her butt off today, went to the grocery store, and began prep for Easter meal. What a huge help that was!
One character was a female Turkish Antique expert, and another a female dilettante who used her massive trust fund to travel the world and indulge her hobby in archaeology. These two I connected to Mr. Troy, them being hired to both accompany him to the “underworld” private auction where a well-preserved 2000 year old Chinese urn containing the ashes of a X’an Dynasty sorcerer. I spent a few minutes running this auction with the girls in attendance, and got to introduce a rival of sorts for Mr. Troy, “Hong Lo,” a restaurateur and reputed occultist.
We don’t know where (s)he lives…
for that which was, is; and will be,
when you left it all to Him.
Till all-soul's time next year.
This is why I said this black glitter was no good! I wore the yellow franken the day after I made it, but look, it's no longer yellow! Because the glitter was still losing color, it changed the color of the polish. I made a fresh one and wore it the next day. You'll see that mixture in the next post.
Kyle has also had the opportunity to serve as a panelist and moderator on various Music & Film panels at the Northern Ontario Music & Film Awards (NOMFA) and the InSight and Sound seminar series put on by Music and Film in Motion (MFM).
“Transmission is a big theme of this conference, and it’s a huge issue as we try to expand, so having these commissioners coming to Arizona to talk about these issues is a very big deal,” Mayes said. “By the same token, it’s critical to have these CEOs here to discuss where they see their industry going and also to delve into what they believe are the regulatory needs. This is an industry at a pivotal point and where we go from the legal and policy standpoints is going to be critical for them.”
On Friday both Cate and I were off school. We dyed some eggs. I ate one and had no issues. I've been feeling pretty awesome lately, too, so I think the worst is over and we'll chalk it up to some weird viral or bacterial thing complicated by an ulcer-- which is pretty much what the doctor called it.
Update: There are a lot of rumors swirling about this group's involvement with the site, and until I get a document or something clearer in my hands, I'll freely admit that I don't exactly know what their connection to it is (some even say this group may be unrelated to the awful landlord). Still, I think can revise this post by simply saying "If these are the Pinnacle guys you've read about, then . . ."
Because most writers are a curious lot, we are comfortable learning about a variety of subjects. Most of us do this at an astonishing pace because we know how to ask subject matter experts the right questions and craft their answers into insightful, intelligent prose. If you’re looking to hire a freelance writer, and the only thing they don’t have is experience in your particular field, then ask them if they are interested in your topic. If they are, then you probably have the beginning of a beautiful working relationship. As a bonus, keep in mind the fact that if you’re paying a flat rate per article, the burden to learn about your business is on the writer.
Yep the cutest frog around!!! he's from pollycraft! i absolutly adore him hehe!! I must admit i'm quite chuffed with my card this morning it's got to be one of my fav's i've made in a while it's quite simple but so different colours than i'd normally make!!
I feel tired. I feel overworked. I feel like this writing dream is getting me nowhere.
So now I have merely got a miserable 300+ hits! Sob!!
The taking of her love.
Conserve battery power by limiting your electrical usage. A single 12-volt ceiling light bulb draws about 1.5 amps per hour; a color TV (and inverter) about 12 amps; the furnace fan and the water pump 7.5 amps each while operating. Obviously, the less amp-hours you consume, the longer your battery will last. So turn off unnecessary lights and keep 12-volt appliance operation to a minimum.
Possession has been glamorize by Hollywood. The Exorcism is a reminder of how enthralled we can be over such things. But it puts the emphasis on a man called a priest to free the girl from the demon and the emphasis should be on Jesus. Only He can free someone who is controlled by demons. Yes, He has given believers authority to cast out demons, but it is only under His power that we can do so and you don’t have to be a Catholic priest to do so.
Carrie Ann: Become Nora Roberts? LOL. No. I just want to be myself. I want to share my worlds and people to like them. I would always love to be a NYT author…but as long as I have readers, I’m happy! *grins* Love love love my readers!!
hope you are all doing great.Google is going to remove old blog interface totally from next month,sigh..i hate the new one,its so difficult to post pictures.Hmm,..well this may reduce our blogging frequency i guess,lets see how fast we get used to it:(.
Another idea: Place them in a bag or basket and randomly pick them out to answer.
The story is pretty standard fare: a family’s car breaks down; they’re stuck with no phone reception so they search for help. They find a large, spooky looking mansion “Count Dracula’s House” and make their way inside. Once inside they run into various groups.
By midday, the tawny fields will be dotted with the cheerful dresses of the women, red as the poinsettias that lace the windy footpaths. Napping babies will sway in wicker baskets, and lizards will sun themselves outside their holes. Like CUT, SOLD never blinks. It doesn't glance away from the hard truths. It doesn't gauze the facts with fairytale. I read both books with my heart in my throat—heartbroken and also awed by McCormick's talent.
- Article 2(1) of the IP Chapter of the Association Agreement has become Article 229(2)(a)
Combine the buttermilk and the vanilla. Alternately add the dry and liquid ingredients to the butter/sugar combo, mixing well after each addition. The batter should be thick and and airy.
The mainstream media is devising a way to present this information. They too have defectors of a grand scale. The flood gates are opening! Be on the stand-by Tots. I must go, much going on, I’ll report back as soon as I can. Allendale out.
YOR: At least it's not happening right here! We'll lose our Fortinbras house though.
4 onions, peeled and chopped
DAVE GANNON drms B
B: Hm, who’s being an antagonist now?
4. Cat macros. How could I possibly hate pictures of little kitties? Because people think it is now acceptable to talk to me like this to my face. It’s not cute. I don’t like having to translate macros while trying to have a serious conversation. And if you ask me “Can I HAZ Chezburger nao plz?”, trust me, you’re not going to get it.
It’s at that point you reach the most astonishing and powerful exhibit on the whole tour, one which truly took my and Mrs H3’s breath away. It’s the scale model of Hogwarts, but to describe it as that just doesn’t do it justice. For some reason I hadn’t expected it to be as large as it was and once you walk around it, and it takes quite some time to do, you discover more about the castle than you would ever learn by watching the films. It is exquisitely sculpted and so intricate in its detail I don’t think you can take it all in after just one look. The lighting is brilliant and takes you through twenty four hours with the castle lighting up as darkness falls, then coming back to life as day breaks. To be honest I could try to describe this amazing exhibit for hours and still not manage to capture how truly fantastic it is. I think the only time I’ve ever been as strongly moved by a piece as this was when I saw the real Statue of David in Florence and anyone who read my blog
Whatever the case, someone questioned the manger’s constitutionality, and the Courthouse Facilities and Grounds Committee reacted by prohibiting citizens from placing any holiday displays on the grounds. Leesburg apparently being devoid of decorations anywhere else, people were outraged at the decision to keep them off Courthouse Square.
Which leaves only it’s status as part one of an accidental trilogy (since Castrovalva wasn’t even remotely planned when this story and Logopolis wrapped). I suppose I’ve rather given the game away on that one by pointing out that it’s an accidental trilogy, but there it is - this is in no way intended to be the start of some high concept arc, and reading it through that lens is deeply misguided. Again, there’s some distant interesting aspect here - the way in which Bidmead and Nathan-Turner navigate the nearly impossible task of writing Tom Baker out of Doctor Who is an impressive piece of television show-running. They take the counter-intuitive but likely necessary approach of declining to make Baker’s departure the climactic event or allowing him to be the star of it, instead opting to build the Davison era’s trappings up around Baker and then finally delete him from a show that’s no longer his own. Certainly several major steps in that direction happen here.
Juan Williams’ recent firing from NPR has tempers flaring and opinions blaring. Amidst all the anger and rhetoric, a couple of key points keep getting overlooked or misrepresented. Whether or not you like Juan Williams or believe he’s a “liberal commentator”, whatever your opinion of NPR or FOX, it is very important to consider the facts of the case.
My children must choose for themselves. And that's scary. They may choose to leave the church. They may choose to disregard all that I have taught them. They may go against everything I believe in.
And I know that a loss is a loss, and I didn’t do anything to warrant a higher number, but it’s still disappointing that I let an opportunity to lose more weight slip by. I did a good job of maintaining, which is an improvement from my recent pattern of overeating due to stress. So progress is happening. Part of the stress I felt this week could have been avoided if I had done the grading in small increments each day. But I let myself have too many off days, and then got stuck in a situation where I HAD to get the papers back to the students by the date I’d promised they’d have them.
I took this photo in an effort to capture three police vehicles on the same corner (Franklin and Bergen): the Mobile Command Center, the mounted police truck (with horses in tow), and one of those little "interceptors" that are the TIE fighters to the Skywatch's AT-AT (nerd alert). At the last second, a car pulled into my frame, blocking the interceptor, and I swore under my breath . . . until I realized it was a police cruiser (click the image for a better view).
So beforehand I’d like to say that this is only a placeholder until Hachette releases volume 9 in English (or that’s how I’m going to look at it). They’ve done a great job translating the series and I hope everyone supports them if they can. I know the wait is really long, but the books are truly worth it. Personally I’m planning on buying my fourth copy of novels 1-5 and second of 6-11 at Anime Expo if possible. (Both versions in Eng/JP)
If you are a celebrity, what you say publicly has an impact. By all means use your influence to advocate for a good cause! Support for breastfeeding is one I fully endorse too. But if you're going to get involved in politics, please don't do it by clamouring for bans of everything you don't approve of! It's lazy, and it does more harm than good.
"I'm fine." She replied as she got up. And then she saw him, and sat back down again. She sniffled with a bite of her lip and shook her head with a smile: "Oh, no, I'm fine. Really."
Everything is pretty mellow here at duck central. Things are very quiet and still on the inside. The weather is just starting to heat up. The kiwi vines and other trees shelter and shade our house so we are dark and cool inside. Bruce the universe thinks I need to do a heap of traveling before Christmas. Armidale, Townsville, Noumea, Geelong and a conference.
For more details, please visit the JustRite Inspiration blog for the official introduction of this set. Also, here is a complete list of links with projects using Butterfly Garden that you will not want to miss:
(80) John interprets the Crucifixion in both a literal and symbolic sense: Jesus is “lifted up” on the cross (8:28, 12:32, 34) just as Moses raised the bronze serpent in the wilderness (3:14) to save his people.
Zemenawi Addis Abeban
There seems to be lots going on in the background, but it's just lots of different bits layered together really :-). The main green patterned paper and the strip running along the width of the card are both by Echo Park Victoria Gardens Collection. The white cotton lace is from my stash, the doily is cut using a Spellbinders die and the paper with tiny orange flowers on top of that is some old SU DP I have had in my cupboard for some time!!
GOOD executive editor Ann Friedman, who has no interest in getting married, has proposed reframing the term “spinster”: “I want to reclaim it, like ‘bitch,’ until it carries the same connotation as ‘bachelor’: free, fun, independent, loving life.” For long-term singles like us, constructing jokes around the #foreveralone hashtag helps recode activities society sees as lonely and pathetic to ones we see as lonely and awesome. I often listen to a sad song that has a lyric that goes like this: “I know you feel how I do, too, and even though I’m close to you, I can’t be what you need, ‘cause you’re just as lost as me.” He sings it like it’s a sad thing, but I think it’s really romantic—one of my life goals is to be close to other people, but not to get tied down to them, and that song helps me remember that.
Please post the name of your blog followed by the item you reviewed. For example, Laura's Reviews (The Strange Case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde).
21 again
Of course, there are always things you can find that you wish you would've done differently. But my changes are minor....things like more lighting on the outside, a pocket door for my closet, more lockers at the back door. But overall, I LOVE IT!!!! If money were no object, I would have loved 5 bedrooms so Noah and Eli didn't have to share. I would have loved a huge porch. A big bonus room. A 6th bedroom for guests. But, of course, money IS an object and I think we did very well using what we had to spend to make our home absolutely perfect for our family!!
Because of the suitability act, not only will producers have more regimen and eyes over their shoulders—but maybe even fewer carriers to do business with— because some insurance companies have responded by being far more selective in choosing distributors.
- Name/Blog
The Flinstones have become a timeless classic in the history of television, while the motion picture “The Man Called Flintstone” has disappeared into relative obscurity. Many fans of the original show are not even aware of its existence. In 2005 there was a planned release of the film on DVD, but a licensing dispute put that on hold (the DVD is for sale in Canada) and it is uncertain at this time if it will ever reach the shelves.
I remember the beginning of the night. Working from before dawn, I'd joined Mr Nights for HH drinks at five, making the rookie mistake of not partaking, snackwise. We pushed on to a steakhouse bar, looking for professional ladies similarly on the prowl. (That would be bankers, lawyers, accountants, not the other kind of professional you perv.)
The fact of the matter is that many students in England heard about the new tuition fee policy and immediately decided they weren’t going to university. Many of them are too scared to throw themselves under such a mountain of debt. With the recent financial crises being caused by unpaid debt… Who can blame them? The SNP have instilled a confidence in students across Scotland who can focus on their studies, and not their finances.
When asked why he loves poetry, Trevor answered, “Poetry is very plastic. Its flexibility stems from the plastic quality of language—every language has poetry. What is fascinating is that when I say dog, something manifests in my mind, which is quite different than in yours. I think there is a certain type of magic here, and poetry is one way to act as magician…When one reads a lot of poetry (and if one is writing as well, I think the ratio of reading to writing should be around 3:1), the world really does start to behave differently. I am not saying that the world is actually shifting, but you are, so your relationship to everything else changes. Experientially, the world does seem like it’s shifting. So doors are opening. Again metaphors are incredibly powerful agents of change. I’ve been a little more explicit with this idea in a series of poems called “North gives flesh to wind:”
Some Extra Guidelines
10. Creation Rebel
As for the Sunday Times today, the kind of time starvation mentioned above - plus of course the arrival of online versions of the Sundays – has bitten deep into its raison d’etre. How many times have we all looked at a pile of unread sections the following Tuesday?
I know, it's so sickly sweet, you wanna gag... that's the note FROM my husband (and I LOVE it!)
This is the perfect creamy pastelle purple color. It is perfect fun color that you can wear anywhere and in some work places you could pull it off beautifully as it’s not too bright.
For it’s Tommy this, an’ Tommy that, an’ “Tommy wait outside”;
I used a Martha Stewart Trellis border punch and really used guess work for the sizing.
My mind has been thinking about electrical matters. I created a spreadsheet that outlines our electrical needs for our various uses of the boat. We can consider several activities
You can find a LOLA store at the following locations:
(all products for #1 & #2 plus...)
Penwizard have kindly offered FREE postage and packaging to any of my readers who wish to purchase a book from them, just go to the website and use the code 150920 at the checkout. They really do have a great range of personalised books for all occasions, for boys and girls!! Would make a perfect gift for any little one!
Now I'm not saying this is pearly white but it's good enough for me and the taste will knock you off your feet, make ya want to sit a spell and enjoy another bowl. Yep, it's that good, and as you can see, it really is deserving of its name. Why it's the real deal and now y'all can say ya know the difference. So folks, the next time you hear someone mention white chicken chili, make sure you set them right.
…Before the service had ended, I left the church; and as I emerged I was struck by two things. First, I found that I had no idea how long I had been inside. It might have been only twenty minutes, it might have been two hours; I could not say. I had been existing on a level at which clock-time was unimportant. Secondly, as I stepped out on the pavement the roar of the London traffic engulfed me all at once like a huge wave. The sound must have been audible within the church, but I had not noticed it. I had been in another world where time and traffic had no meaning; a world that was more real — I would almost say more solid — than that of twentieth-century London to which I now abruptly returned.
From Southern California to Southern Nevada, the Holy Trinity of Amateur Mixed Martial Arts is made up of three promotions that could easily compete against the best in the country for the title of #1 promotion. It makes for a great environment in the Las Vegas area for amateurs and creates a great platform for developing the next stars of MMA.
a mere blink,
“Riley. Do you know him?” All the color drained from Nico’s face.
Today’s choices shape our tomorrows. What will you choose?
The UN, NATO, and complicit media outlets across the West, by contradicting a growing awareness of the reality of both the terroristic nature of the Syrian rebels, and the depth of deceit directed against the global public in regards to the conflict in Syria since the beginning, undermines entirely the legitimacy they and the “international law” they claim to uphold, have. In regards to Libya, US think-tank the Brookings Institution openly stated that it was about asserting the “primacy of international law” over the nation-state.
Loki causes a distraction in Germany so his brainwashed people can keep working on the Tesseract, and he is confronted by Captain America for the first time while ordering everyone to kneel and worship him. Iron Man pops in to help him out, and Loki willingly agrees to be taken in. They meet Thor on the way in, who just yoinks his brother and has a big confrontation. They fight about Loki’s betrayal and Thor insists he can come home, that they can work this out, and to leave Earth alone. In the midst of this Iron Man attacks, thinking Thor is a friend of Loki’s, and they have a big battle that Cap breaks up. Loki is put into a cage that was originally intended by the Hulk, and the team starts to bond … and argue. Banner and Stark in particular get close since they respect one another as scientists, and Stark encourages Banner to open his mind to the Hulk’s true potential. They taunt Cap for not thinking about the big picture, because obviously Nick Fury was planning on using the Tesseract for other plans. Black Widow manages to get Loki to admit he’s there at least partially for Banner, and he wants to set the Hulk off in the Helicarrier. The group starts fighting, not in small part due to Loki’s nearby scepter that seems to encourage anger, but it’s from real reasons too. Nick Fury and his people did plan to make weapons out of the Tesseract, and he says it’s because of the team. The super powered people are too potentially dangerous, and they were taking steps to counteract that. During this fight, Loki’s people break into the Helicarrier. It starts to break down and what he wants happens; the Hulk comes out and starts attacking everyone. Loki is then saved, he tosses Thor into his own cage and tries to kill him, and he does manage to kill a very important member of the series who shall go unnamed here. Ahem. I may mention it later so be aware that big spoiler is somewhere below. I will try to mark it accordingly.
because there never seems to be an appropriate answer that sums up "ME".
in his restoring his relationship with
I am a huge Bowie fan, so his book was a must get for me! and the Bansky book it's just awesome, in Spain the price goes higher every time I check it on the Fnac, so it was a deal that I just happily took. Michael Jackson biography wasn't for me, it costs 1 pound, but it's expensive if you think that MJ still alive and the end of the book, but when I start reading I couldn't stop. I watched every video they talk about on youtube, and the whole story catch me. When I a was a kid he was at the top of the world, but I managed to not notice his work until I was a grown up. It's a real issue for me. How could I miss him for so long? I'm kind of ashamed xD
Doors open at 6.30 for a 7pm show start. As well as the fashion show there will be Live music, FREE food, spot prizes, raffle, dances and lots more. All for only €12 which is going towards a very worthy cause.
“Spirits served here” was the message above the cemetery stations of the London Necropolis Company (LNC), the sign was to show the mourners that they could have alcoholic beverages. I’d suggest it was also a good bit of comedy for permanent residents of Brookwood.
Ink: Calypso Coral and Soft Suede
The story that Jesus tells here is a common one, even in Jesus’ time. It wasn’t unusual to think that fortunes might be reversed in a future life. What was unusual in Jesus’ story is that the rich man wasn’t allowed to go back and warn others. Then, he wasn’t even allowed to send Lazarus back to warn his loved ones. In this story, the rich man is like the older brother in chapter 15, who would like to keep the poor and the sinners outside, unseen, ignored. But Jesus is inviting them in. Jesus takes the standard idea that the poor and broken will be blessed in the distant future and brings that time into the present and makes it the responsibility of all of those who would be his followers.
“Miss Dorothy L. Sayers: Christian Apologist and Novelist.” The Times. December 19, 1957.
wasn’t your mum. I hate it when girls liked it on you.
The combination of the song, story, and length makes this ad stand out during a commercial break. It is essentially a short film without any overt attempts to get the viewer to purchase anything. Many of us are skilled at tuning out commercials, yet this one is powerful enough to hold the audience’s interest. The storytelling aspect involves us emotionally and makes us watch to find out what happens.
First, contrary to what they have been saying, not all unions have agreed to pension and health care concessions. At the local level, many unions and municipalities have been scrambling to approve their contracts before passage of the budget repair bill, and these contracts do not reflect the concessions that the union leaders claim to be offering.
On chores:
Protection of Constitutional Democracy against Terrorist
BREATHE Welcome Thank you for coming out tonight Thank you to Tim and Simon for having me Lovely to see you all I’ll just get used to being up here, talk a little about my book, then it’s prosecco time BREATHE My daughter said that as I’ve written a funny book about sex in Italy that I should be able to give a funny talk about sex in Italy. I don’t know that it’s going to be so easy. This is my first published novel and my first book launch, so please excuse my shakiness. BREATHE I’ll speak briefly about three things: confusing the narrator with the author and how not to do this; working with an independent publisher at a time when everybody is writing about vampires or sugar-free erotica; and then I’ll read a little and send you off to have a drink. BREATHE My name is Catherine, I am Australian from Sydney. I ran away to Paris when I was 21 thinking I was Simone de Beauvoir. I WASN’T. I ended up babysitting and writing my first novel above a sweatshop, then hanging out in the square listening to the Congolese ladies, and pushing a pram all the way around Paris so I wouldn’t have to do baby things. I think I was the worst babysitter in the world. I married young and spent the next 15 or so years between Europe and Africa, with nine years in Accra. I don’t talk about any of this in the book. Although it is throughout my book of short stories which is coming out next year, so maybe if we don’t spill too many drinks I’ll be here again next year.
So, smile like a baby and people will help you?? Well, OK, not quite as simple as that. But it does suggest something about luck, because surely having your wallet returned when you've dropped it is a matter of luck? That's what you'd say, isn't it? "Yay, I was lucky to have my purse returned."
@Marrickville Townhall
Just posting this pictures, I am dreaming of another trip back so I can gorge myself on junk again. These pictures will never do the deliciousness justice, one must venture that way to taste for themselves.
With the mixer on low slowly add half the flour mixture. Mix until just blended. Add the mil mixture. Mix until just blended. Slowly add remaining flour mixture scrapping down sides of the bowl with spatula as necessary.
Back later with some more sneaks. Hope you have a great day!
I chose to participate in the Newton Challenge because it's a run that's like no other. And I thought, completing this 25 km course of multiple, erratic elevations would be good motivation to start the brand new year. I’ve read a lot about the Ammah Hills and I still don’t understand the reason behind this moniker. Regardless, this was one steep, fierce mama. Looking at the race map, I was also slightly intimidated by the names of some major points along the route as well, like PUNCAK Jalil and Paragon HEIGHTS. They do sound high. So, the Newton Challenge is not just about conquering the distance, but more significantly, it’s about one’s ability to defy gravity.
1. As usual you should blog about this contest together with the complete list of sponsors. Place the contest widget on your sidebar and then RELAX (inhale.. exhale) - leave the URL of your blog post here.
Less than a week after the boys left, mom came to visit for a week. And the day before she arrived, the humidity arrived. Talk about bad timing. In all the time I was there, the period of humidity was the longest when mom was there.
For Wrigley, a unit of Mars Inc., the tragedy presents another, more surreal dimension. Protestors carried bags of the chewy fruit-flavored candy while marching for the arrest of shooter George Zimmerman. Mourners pinned the bright red wrappers to their hooded sweatshirts at memorial services.
But, to be honest, unless you're trying to brew a competition beer, I'm not so sure that a percentage here or there is ultimately going to make too much difference. According to the Murphy's web site, Bramling Cross come in the acid range of 5%-7% and Target 8% -10%. If I take the lower end of the scale, I don't think I'll go far wrong.
